Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located at Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas.
The runway name of Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is 18L/36R.
The ICAO Location Identifier of Afonso Pena International Airport is SBCT.
Afonso Pena International Airport serves the city of Curitiba.
The Al Taqaddum Air Base serves the city of Fallujah.
The runway length of Al Taqaddum Air Base is 3684.0.
The runway name of Alderney Airport is 14/32.
The runway length of Allama Iqbal International Airport is 3360.12.
The 1st runway at Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is number 18.
The 5th runway at Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is made of asphalt.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol runway name is 06/24 Kaagbaan.
Andrews County Airport is 973 metres above sea level.
Andrews County Airport is owned by Andrews County, Texas.
The runway length of Andrews County Airport is 896.
The first runway at Angola International Airport is made of asphalt.
Antwerp International Airport is 12 metres above sea level.
The Antwerp International Airport is operated by the Flemish Government.
The runway length of Appleton International Airport is 2439.0.
The runway length of Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 518.0.
The ICAO Location Identifier of Ashgabat International Airport is UTAA.
11/29 is the runway name of Ashgabat International Airport.
Atlantic City International Airport is owned by the South Jersey Transportation Authority.
The runway name of Atlantic City International Airport is 13/31.
Dutch is the language spoken in Belgium.
Curitiba is part of the South Region, Brazil.
Danes is the name of the people of Denmark.
Fallujah is in Iraq.
Greenville, Wisconsin is located within the United States.
Greenville is part of Grand Chute, Wisconsin.
Arabic is the language spoken in Iraq.
Madrid is in Spain.
Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County, Michigan is part of the United States.
Sardar Ayaz Sadiq is the leader of Pakistan.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey serves the region of New Jersey.
Houston is the largest city in Texas.
The United States Air Force fought in the United States bombing of Libya in 1986.
The Boeing C-17 Globemaster III is a transport aircraft of the United States Air Force.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument was established in 2000.
Adams County, Pennsylvania has Carrol County, Maryland to its southeast.
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan.
The leader of Azerbaijan is called the Prime Minister.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is native name Turk Sehitleri Aniti.
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa.
250 Delaware Avenue is in the postmodern style of architecture.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago.
George Winkler was the architect of 320 South Boston Building.
The building of 320 South Boston was started in 1910.
The AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen has 814 rooms.
James Pain and George Richard Pain were the architects of Adare Manor.
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale.
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Japan.
Alan B Miller Hall is owned by the College of William and Mary.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located at Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT University, opp. Gujarat University, University Road.
The Reference Number in the National Register of Historic Places for Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House is 88002539.
Julia Morgan was the architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds.
The Asilomar Conference Grounds are designed in the architectural style of "Arts and Crafts Movement and American craftsman Bungalows".
The Asilomar Conference Grounds were constructed in 1913.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City.
Buffalo, New York is part of Erie County, New York.
Buffalo, New York's leader is Byron Brown.
County Limerick is part of Munster.
Criona Ni Dhalaigh is the leader of Dublin.
The leader of Ethiopia is Mulatu Teshome.
Indian people inhabit India.
Julia Morgan was the architect of the Los Angeles Herald Examiner building.
Live Nation Entertainment is located in Beverly Hills, California.
Manhattan is part of New York.
New York City is part of New Netherland.
Pacific Grove is part of California.
White South Africans are an ethnic group in South Africa.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom.
1634: The Ram Rebellion has the ISBN number 1-4165-2060-0.
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion.
1634: The Ram Rebellion is available in print form.
The AIDS journal is published in the United Kingdom.
A Glastonbury Romance has the OCLC number 76798317.
A Glastonbury Romance is available in hardcover.
A Long Long Way is written in English.
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars.
The ISSN number of Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg is 0025-5858.
Above the Veil was written by Garth Nix.
Above the Veil is available in print.
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica has the ISSN number 0567-7920.
The LCCN number of Addiction journal is 93645978.
Addiction (journal) comes under the academic discipline of addiction.
Aenir is written in English.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is written in English.
The American Journal of Mathematics is concerned with the academic discipline of Mathematics.
The English language is spoken in the book Castle.
Eric Flint was born in Burbank, California.
Macmillan Publishers own Farrar Straus and Giroux.
John Cowper Powys notable work is A Glastonbury Romance.
Soho Press is located in the United States.
The Secret Scripture is published by Faber and Faber.
Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
The English language is spoken in the United States.
A Glastonbury Romance preceded Weymouth Sands.
Rolando Maran is the manager of AC Chievo Verona.
A.D. Isidro Metapan play in the Salvadoran Primera Division.
The full name of A.F.C. Blackpool is "Association Football Club Blackpool".
The ground of A.F.C. Blackpool is The Mechanics.
AFC Blackpool's ground is in Blackpool.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Gubbio.
A.S. Gubbio 1910 has 5300 members.
AEK Athens F.C.'s ground is in Athens.
AEK Athens FC played in the 2014-15 Football League in Greece.
AZAL Arena is located in Baku.
AZAL PFK play in the Azerbaijan Premier League.
AZ Alkmaar played in the Eredivisie in the 2014-15 season.
Akron, Ohio is located in the United States.
Akron, Ohio is located in Summit County, Ohio.
Akron Summit Assault's full name is "Akron Metro Futbol Club Summit Assault".
Amsterdam's leader is Eberhard van der Laan.
Christian Panucci plays for Chelsea FC.
Christian Panucci plays for Inter Milan.
Frank de Boer played for FC Barcelona.
Gubbio is located in the region of Umbria.
Sergio Mattarella is the leader of Italy.
Jens Härtel is in the FC Sachsen Leipzig club.
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez plays for FC Dallas.
Luciano Spalletti plays for Udinese Calcio.
Massimo Drago plays for A.S.D. S.S. Nola 1925.
Michele Marcolini plays for Atalanta B.C.
Michele Marcolini plays for Vicenza Calcio.
Peter Stoger plays for 1. FC Koln.
Rolando Maran is attached to the club F.C. Bari 1908.
Jong Ajax is the tenant of Sportpark De Toekomst.
St. Vincent-St. Mary High School is located in the United States.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is in the state of Alba.
The president of Acharya Institute of Technology is B.M. Reddy.
Kerala has Mahe, India to its northwest.
Mendrisio is a neighbouring municipality of Meride.
The capital of Romania is Bucharest.
Thomas Pallesen is Dean of the School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University has 16000 students.
Alan Bean is a United States national.
Buzz Aldrin was the backup pilot of Apollo 8.
Buzz Aldrin graduated from Massachusetts Institute of Technology with a Sc.D in 1963.
Buzz Aldrin was a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin was selected by NASA in 1963.
Benitoite is a gemstone found in California.
Elliot See died on 1966-02-28.
Elliot See died in St. Louis.
Elliot See is deceased.
Kevin Eastman created April O'Neil.
Bananaman was broadcast by the BBC.
Benjamin Urich's full name is Benjamin Urich.
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Jerry Ordway.
Bo Bibbowski is the full name of Bibbo Bibbowski.
Bill Oddie was born in Lancashire.
The alternative name for Black Pirate is Jon Valor.
John Buscema won the Eisner Award.
Karl Kesel is an American.
Marv Wolfman won the Kirby Award.
The nationality of Peter Laird is United States.
Scott Adsit was born in Northbrook, Illinois.
The area code of Albany, Georgia is 229.
Albany, Oregon is part of the United States.
The leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico is called the Mayor.
The leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico is called the New Mexico House of Representatives.
The leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico is called the New Mexico Senate.
Amarillo, Texas has a total area of 233.9 square kilometres.
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas.
Anderson is part of Richland Township, Madison County, Indiana.
Angola, Indiana is elevated 324.0 above sea level.
The area code of Antioch, California is 925.
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California.
Arlington, Texas has a population density of 1472.0 inhabitants per square kilometre.
Kasim Reed is the leader of Atlanta.
The total area of Atlantic City, New Jersey is 44.125 square kilometres.
Atlantic City, New Jersey is part of New Jersey.
Attica, Indiana is 166.0 above sea level.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama.
Auburn, Washington has a total area of 77.41 square kilometres.
Austin is part of Texas.
Spanish is the language spoken in California.
Dunwoody is the largest city in DeKalb County, Georgia.
Fulton County, Georgia is located within the United States.
Anderson is the county seat of Madison County, Indiana.
Michigan is in the United States.
Detroit is the largest city in Michigan.
Orange County, California is located within the United States.
Portland is the largest city in Oregon.
The largest city in Tarrant County, Texas is Fort Worth, Texas.
Barack Obama is the leader of the United States.
The United States House of Representatives is located in the United States Capitol.
Pecorino Romano is an ingredient in Amatriciana sauce.
Chili pepper is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce.
White rice is an ingredient in Arros negre.
Arros negre is from the Catalonia region.
Arros negre is from the Valencian Community region.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Singapore.
Tomato is an ingredient in the BLT.
Baked Alaska is from Hong Kong.
Bakewell pudding can be served warm or cold.
Bandeja paisa is a typical Colombian cuisine.
Chicharron is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Bandeja paisa is from the Paisa region.
Barny cakes can be served in 30.0g.
Shumai is a variation of the batagor dish.
The main ingredients of Batagor are fried fish dumplings with tofu and vegetables in peanut sauce.
Shrimp is an ingredient in Batchoy.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Indonesia.
Bhaji or bajji are alternative names for Bhajji.
Taro is an ingredient in binignit.
Cottage cheese is a variation of Bionico.
Bionico is a food found in the region of Jalisco.
Chicken is a class of bird.
The currency of India is the Indian rupee.
Sumitra Mahajan is the leader of India.
The language spoken in Indonesia is Indonesian.
Aristoteles Sandoval is the leader of Jalisco.
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java.
Malaysian Malay is an ethnic group in Malaysia.
Silvano Aureoles Conejo is the leader of Mexico.
The Spanish language is spoken in New York.
Shumai is a food found in China.
Peanut sauce is an ingredient in Siomay.
Malays are an ethnic group from Sumatra.
David Cameron is the leader of the United Kingdom.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument, which was established in 2000, falls under the category of Contributing property.
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the Monocacy National Battlefield, Frederick, Maryland.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku and is located in Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. Its native name is Turk Sehitleri Aniti.
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Akron, Ohio is located.
Albany is part of Oregon, where the capital is Salem.
The United States House of Representatives is the leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico, United States.
Amarillo, Texas is part of Texas, United States.
Anaheim, California is part of California, where the leader is the United States House of Representatives.
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California, United States.
Anderson is part of Adams Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Antioch, California has an elevation of 13.0 above sea level and a total area of 75.324 square kilometres.
Arlington, Texas has an elevation of 184.0 above sea level and a total area of 258.2 square kilometres.
Arlington is part of Texas, United States.
Atlanta is part of Georgia, United States.
Atlantic City, New Jersey, is part of Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States.
Atlantic City, New Jersey is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC.
Atlantic City, New Jersey is part of Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States.
The population density of Atlantic City, New Jersey, is 141.2 inhabitants per square kilometre and it has a total area of 44.125 square kilometres.
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States.
Albany is part of the United States, where the capital is Washington DC.
Amarillo, Texas is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Albany, Georgia is part of the United States where Native Americans are an ethnic group.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Auburn, Alabama is located.
Akron, Ohio is located in the United States where the language is English.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is in the United States where the leader is known as the President.
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional Italian sauce, it includes tomatoes.
Arem arem is a dish from Indonesia where Jusuf Kalla is the leader.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Italy where the Italian language is spoken.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Italy where Sergio Mattarella is the leader.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Italy and includes chili pepper.
Arros negre is from the Valencian Community region of Spain.
Asam pedas is a dish from Indonesia and it's main ingredients are fish cooked in a sour and hot sauce.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Malaysia and Indonesia.
The BLT is a variation of the club sandwich and a bacon sandwich.
The main ingredients of a Bacon Explosion are bacon and sausage.
Bacon sandwiches are also known as a bacon butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon sanger, piece 'n bacon, bacon cob, bacon barm, or bacon muffin.
Bread is an ingredient of a bacon sandwich which is a variation of a BLT.
Sponge cake is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which is from France.
Baked Alaska is from France where Manuel Valls is a leader.
Baked Alaska, which contains meringue, is from the United States.
Fruit preserves are an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of Bakewell pudding.
Vermicelli is an ingredient of Bakso which is a dish from Indonesia.
Celery is a member of the Apiaceae family and is an ingredient in Bakso.
Chicharrón is an ingredient in the Colombian dish Bandeja paisa.
Barny cakes can be found in France where Claude Bartolone is the leader.
Peanut sauce is an ingredient in Batagor which is a dish from Indonesia.
Peanut sauce is an ingredient in a batagor, a variation of Siomay.
Palm sugar is an ingredient in beef kway teow which is a popular dish in Singapore.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Halimah Yacob is the leader.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore and Indonesia and its main ingredients are Kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, sliced, dried black beans, garlic, dark soy sauce, lengkuas, oyster sauce, soya sauce, chilli and sesame oil.
Bhajji originates from India where the people are called Indians.
Bhajji originates from India where T.S. Thakur is the leader.
Binignit is a dish from the Philippines where the Igorot people are an ethnic group.
The main ingredient of binignit is banana and it comes from the Philippines.
The main ingredients of Binignit are sweet potato and banana.
Bionico is a food found in Mexico where Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader.
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico which is a food found in Guadalajara.
Bionico is a dessert. A variation of dessert is cake.
Bakso is a dish from Indonesia, where Joko Widodo is the leader.
Shumai is a variation of the batagor dish which contains shiitake.
Aarhus Lufthavn A/S is the operating organisation for Aarhus Airport which has a runway length of 2777.0.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. It is elevated 610 metres above sea level.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. Its runway length is 3500.
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province, Iraq and has a runway length of 3090.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Iraq where Arabic is spoken.
The United States Air Force, who were involved in the Invasion of Grenada, operate Al Asad airbase.
The surface of the 1st runway at Alderney Airport is poaceae which is in the class Monocotyledon.
The first runway at Alderney Airport is made of asphalt and has a length of 877.0.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Pakistan where Anwar Zaheer Jamali is the leader.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Punjab, Pakistan and has a runway length of 2900.0.
Amsterdam Airport Schipol is -3.3528 above sea level and the 1st runway is 3800 metres long.
Amsterdam Airport Schipol is -3.3528 above sea level and the 1st runway is made of asphalt.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam and has a runway length of 2014.0.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam and has a runway length of 3300.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas where Houston is the largest city.
Angola International Airport serves the city of Luanda and has a runway length of 3800.
The 3rd runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae and has a length of 597.0.
Ashgabat International Airport is 211 metres above sea level and its 1st runway is 12467 feet long.
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines, whose headquarters are in Turkmenistan.
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation of Atlantic City International Airport which has the runway name 4/22.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation of Atlantic City International Airport which has a runway length of 3048.0.
Afonso Pena International Airport is operated by Infraero, Brasilia.
1 FC Magdeburg played in the Regionalliga in 2014-15 and has 27250 members.
A.C. Chievo Verona, with 39371 members, plays at their ground in Verona, Italy.
Rolando Maran was born in Italy and manages A.C. Chievo Verona.
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez manages the A.D. Isidro Metapan and plays for FC Dallas.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis has 1500 members and played in the 2014-15 A EPSTH Greece season.
Stuart Parker, who is a member of the Blackburn Rovers F.C. club, is the manager of AFC Blackpool.
Stuart Parker, who is attached to Irlam Town FC, is the manager of AFC Blackpool.
AFC Fylde's ground is in Lancashire and they have 3180 members.
A.S. Gubbio 1910 has 5300 members and its ground is located in Gubbio.
A.S. Livorno Calcio's ground is in Livorno and they play in Serie B.
A.S. Livorno Calcio are managed by Christian Panucci who plays for A.S. Roma.
Paulo Sousa manages ACF Fiorentina and plays for Juventus FC.
ACF Fiorentina (abbreviated to ACF Fiorentina S.p.A.) has 47290 members.
AEK Athens F.C. has 69618 members and their ground is in Greece.
AEK Athens FC play in the Superleague Greece and their ground is the Olympic Stadium (Athens).
AFC Ajax (amateurs)'s ground is Sportpark De Toekomst, which has Jong Ajax as its tenant.
AZAL Arena is the ground of AZAL PFK which is located in Shuvalan, Baku, Azerbaijan.
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members and played in the 2011 PDL season.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Gubbio, Umbria.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where Pietro Grasso is the leader.
Luciano Spalletti manages AS Roma and plays for Empoli F.C.
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Bavarian Crisis which was preceded by The Grantville Gazettes.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Virginia DeMarce and is available in the E book.
AIP Advances (abbreviated to AIP Adv.) has the EISSN number 2158.
A Fortress of Grey Ice was written by J.V. Jones and was published in print.
A Fortress of Grey Ice has 672 pages and the ISBN number 0-7653-0633-6.
A Glastonbury Romance was written by John Cowper Powys and was followed by Weymouth Sands.
A Long Long Way was published in Print & Paperback and has the OCLC number 57392246.
A Long Long Way has 292 pages and the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4.
Penguin Random House is the parent company of Viking Press, which published A Long Long Way.
A Loyal Character Dancer was written by Qiu Xiaolong and is available in print form.
A Severed Wasp has the OCLC number 8805735 and the ISBN number 0-374-26131-8.
A Severed Wasp is available in hardcover and has the OCLC number 8805735.
A Severed Wasp is written in English which is the language spoken in Great Britain.
A Severed Wasp was published in print and has the ISBN number 0-374-26131-8.
Julius Springer founded Springer Science+Business Media which is the publisher of Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg.
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the literary genre Fantasy literature and has the ISBN number 0-439-92550-9.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has the OCLC number 78771100 and the ISBN number 0-439-92550-9.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians was written by Brandon Sanderson and followed by Alcatraz Versus the Scrivener's Bones.
The American Journal of Mathematics (abbreviated to Am. J. Math) comes under the academic discipline of Mathematics.
The American Journal of Mathematics is published by Johns Hopkins University Press which is the parent company of Johns Hopkins University Press.
1634 The Ram Rebellion was written in the United States, where the capital city is Washington D.C.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States, where the capital city is Washington DC.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
The nickname of the 1 Decembrie 1918 University is Uab and it is located in the state of Alba.
Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University in Belgaum.
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Bangalore and its president is B.M. Reddy.
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All India Council for Technical Education in Mumbai.
The AWH Engineering College is located in Kerala, where Kochi is the leader.
The creator of April O'Neil is Peter Laird, who is a United States national.
Jill Shilling starred in Bananaman which was broadcast by the BBC.
Graeme Garden stars in Bananaman which was broadcast by STV.
Tim Brooke-Taylor, born in Derbyshire, starred in Bananaman.
Baymax first appeared in the film Big Hero 6, which stars Alan Tudyk.
Baymax first appeared in the film Big Hero 6, which stars Scott Adsit.
Baymax, created by Steven T Seagle, is a character in Big Hero 6.
The comic book character Ben Urich was created by Roger McKenzie and the full name Benjamin Urich.
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Marv Wolfman and Jerry Ordway.
Bibbo Bibbowski, full name Bo Bibbowski, was created by Marv Wolfman.
Alan Bean was born on March 15, 1932 and is now retired.
Alan Shepard was a test pilot and is deceased.
Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20th, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County, New Jersey.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and was a crew member of Apollo 8.
William Anders graduated from AFIT in 1962 with an M.S. He is now retired.
108 St. Georges Terrace, completed in 1988, has 50 floors.
200 Public Square in the United States has 45 floors.
20 Fenchurch Street has 34 floors and a floor area of 62145.3 square metres.
300 North LaSalle, Chicago has 60 floors.
George Winkler was the architect of 320 South Boston Building in the United States.
HOK SVE was the architect of the 3Arena which is located at East Link Bridge.
The 3Arena, designed by the company Populous, is located in Dublin.
Marriott International is the tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which is located in Copenhagen.
The architect of Adare Manor was George Richard Pain and it was completed in 1862.
Adare Manor is located in Adare, County Limerick.
Addis Ababa City Hall is located in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia.
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka and has the Tudor Revival architectural style.
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka and has the Tudor Revival architectural style.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan where the Akita Museum of Art is located.
The Akita Museum of Art is located at 1-4-2 Nakadori and has 3 floors.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Gujarat, near CEPT University, opp. Gujarat University, University Road.
Ampara Hospital is in Eastern Province, Sri Lanka where Austin Fernando is the leader.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, United States.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, Brooklyn.
Adare Manor is located in County Limerick, Munster.
3Arena is located in Dublin, Republic of Ireland.
Alan Bean is a United States national who was born in Wheeler, Texas. He is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey, United States, where Joe Biden is a leader.
American Buzz Aldrin graduated from Massachusetts Institute of Technology with a Sc.D in 1963. He was selected by NASA in 1963.
Elliot See was born in Dallas and graduated from the University of Texas at Austin.
Elliot See graduated from the University of Texas at Austin and was selected by NASA in 1962. He died in St. Louis.
Elliot See graduated from the University of Texas at Austin and died in St Louis where Francis G Slay is the leader.
Elliot See died in St Louis, Kingdom of France on February 28th 1966.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire, where the purple finch is a bird. He spent 13017.0 minutes in space.
1634: The Bavarian Crisis, written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric Flint, has 448 pages and is available in print form.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was preceded by 1634: The Galileo Affair and is written in English which is spoken in Great Britain.
Alexander L. Wolf is the leader of the Association for Computing Machinery which is headquartered in New York City and is the publisher of ACM Transactions on Information Systems.
The AIDS journal, ISSN number 0269-9370, is part of the academic discipline HIV/AIDS.
The AIDS journal, which has the ISSN number 1473-5571, is part of the academic discipline HIV/AIDS.
A T Charlie Johnson is the editor of AIP Advances and lives in the United States. His alma mater is Stanford University.
A Fortress of Grey Ice was written by J.V. Jones and has the OCLC number 51969173 and the ISBN number 0-7653-0633-6.
A Loyal Character Dancer was written by Qiu Xiaolong and has the OCLC number 49805501 and the ISBN number 1-56947-301-3.
A Loyal Character Dancer is written in English and published by Soho Press in the United States.
A Severed Wasp is written in English, the language spoken in Great Britain. It originates from the United States.
A Severed Wasp is available in hardcover and has 388 pages. It has the OCLC number 8805735.
Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg (abbreviated to Abh. Math. Semin. Univ. Hambg.) has the ISSN number 1865-8784 and the LCCN number 32024459.
Above the Veil is a book written in English and was followed by Aenir which was written in Australia.
The book Aenir was written by Garth Nix and was followed by Above the Veil which is written in English.
Above the Veil, written by Garth Nix, is available in hardcover and has 248 pages.
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica (abbreviated to Acta Palaeontol. Pol.) has the ISSN number 0567-7920 and the LCCN number 60040714.
Addiction (journal) is a discipline of addiction and has the abbreviated name of Addiction. It has the ISSN number 1360-0443.
John Wiley & Sons is the parent company of Wiley-Blackwell which publishes the journal Addiction which has the ISSN number 0965-2140.
Cornell University, New York, is the publisher of Administrative Science Quarterly. Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of American Universities.
Aenir was written in English and was followed by Above the Veil. It was written by Garth Nix.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is written in English, which is the language spoken in Great Britain. It is from the United States.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is 320 pages long and is available in hardcover. The OCLC number is 78771100.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where English is spoken and Great Britain is also the language.
John Cowper Powys was born in Shirley, Derbyshire and died in Blaenau Ffestiniog. He wrote A Glastonbury Romance.
Sara Miller McCune is the founder of SAGE Publications which publishes the Administrative Science Quarterly which has the ISSN number 0001-8392.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where the capital is Washington DC and Native Americans are an ethnic group.
A Wizard of Mars was published in English and is from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where the capital city is Washington DC and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
1634 The Ram Rebellion comes from the United States where the leader is known as the President and African Americans are an ethnic group.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where the leader is known as the President and Native Americans are an ethnic group.
Jens Härtel has been the manager of 1 FC Magdeburg and played for 1. FC Lokomotive Leipzig and SV Germania Schoneiche.
Massimo Drago is the manager of A C Cesena and plays for A.S.D. Licata 1931 and A.S.S. Nola 1925.
Associazione Calcio Lumezzane SpA is the full name of A.C. Lumezzane, who has 4150 members, played in the Lega Pro/A.
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez is the manager of A D Isidro Metapan and plays for Alianza F.C. and the El Salvador national football team.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis's ground is located in Efxeinoupoli and has 1500 members. The chairman of the club is Antonis Milionis.
AFC Blackpool, full name Association Football Club Blackpool, has 1500 members and their ground is in Blackpool.
Stuart Parker, who is attached to Chesterfield FC and runs the Runcorn FC Halton, is the manager of AFC Blackpool.
Dave Challinor is a member of the Stockport County F.C. and is attached to the Colwyn Bay F.C. club. He is the manager of AFC Fylde.
Livorno Calcio S.p.A. is the full name of A.S. Livorno Calcio. It has 19238 members and its ground is in Livorno, Italy.
A.S. Livorno Calcio play in Serie B, where Carpi FC 1909 were champions. Their manager is Christian Panucci.
A.S. Livorno Calcio are managed by Christian Panucci who plays for Chelsea FC and Real Madrid CFC.
AEK Athens FC play in the Superleague Greece, where Olympiacos FC are previous champions. Their ground is in Greece.
AEK Athens F.C. are managed by Gus Poyet who plays for Real Zaragoza and Chelsea F.C.
Amsterdam-Centrum is part of Amsterdam where Eberhard van der Laan is the leader. The ground of AFC Ajax (amateurs) is located in Amsterdam.
Amsterdam-Noord is part of Amsterdam where Eberhard van der Laan is the leader. The ground of AFC Ajax (amateurs) is located in Amsterdam.
John van den Brom is the manager of AZ Alkmaar and plays for Jong Ajax and Istanbulspor A.S.
Agremiaço Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série C league in Brazil. Their ground is the Estadio Municipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca.
Luciano Spalletti manages AS Roma and plays for Udinese Calcio. He also plays for Empoli F.C. and Empoli F.C.
Massimo Drago is attached to the club S.S. Chieti Calcio and manages A.C. Cesena. He also plays for A.S.D. Licata 1931.
Massimo Drago is attached to the club A.S.D. S.S. Nola 1925 and plays for U.S Castrovillari Calcio. He is also the manager of A C Cesena.
Massimo Drago is attached to the club U.S Castrovillari Calcio and manages A.C. Cesena. He also plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio.
103 Colmore Row is located on Colmore Row, Birmingham. The architect John Madin was born in Birmingham.
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, Cuyahoga County, Ohio, where Frank G Jackson is the leader.
250 Delaware Avenue, United States has 12 floors and a floor area of 30843.8 square metres.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, DuPage County, Illinois. Rahm Emanuel is the leader of Chicago.
The architect of 320 South Boston Building, which has 22 floors, is George Winkler, who is from the United States.
HOK SVE was the architect of the 3Arena, which was completed in December 2008 and is located at North Wall Quay.
Marriott International is the tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, Denmark. It has 23 floors.
The tenant of the AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which has 23 floors, is Marriott International. The architect of the hotel was 3XN.
Augustus Pugin was born in Bloomsbury and designed the Adare Manor. He also designed the Palace of Westminster and also the significant building.
The architect of Adare Manor was Philip Charles Hardwick and it was completed in 1862. It is owned by J.P. McManus.
Adisham Hall, Haputale, has the architectural style of Tudor and Jacabian and was completed in 1931.
Adisham Hall, Sri Lanka, was completed in 1931 and has the architectural style of Tudor and Jacabian.
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka, where Ranil Wickremesinghe is the leader.
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka, where the capital is Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte and the currency is the Sri Lankan rupee.
The Mason School of Business are the current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall in the United States. The building was started on the 30 March 2007.
San Francisco born architect Julia Morgan designed the grounds of Asilomar Conference and the Riverside Art Museum.
Californian born architect Julia Morgan designed significant buildings in Chinatown, San Francisco and Asilomar Conference Grounds.
Asilomar Conference Grounds is located at Asilomar Blvd., Pacific Grove, California and was added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1987 with the reference number 87000823.
Asser Levy Public Baths, constructed in 1904, are located in Avenue A, Manhattan and were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 1980-04-23.
The Asser Levy Public Baths were constructed in 1904 and are located in New York City. They were added to the National Register of Historic Places on 1980-04-23.
103 Colmore Row was designed by the architect John Madin who was born in Birmingham, which is lead by the Conservative Party (UK).
103 Colmore Row was designed by the architect John Madin, who was born in Birmingham, which is lead by the Liberal Democrats.
The Addis Ababa City Hall is located in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia, where Hailemariam Desalegn is the leader.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat. Anandiben Patel is the leader of Gujarat.
Bill Marriott is a key person at Marriott International which is located in Bethesda, Maryland and is the tenant of the AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen.
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia, in the United States where Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
The population density of Albuquerque, New Mexico, is 1142.3 inhabitants per square kilometre, and the leader of the country is the New Mexico Senate. The total area is 490.9 square kilometres.
Alpharetta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Alpharetta is part of the U.S. state of Georgia, where Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
Alpharetta, Georgia is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
Anaheim, California has a UTC offset of -7 and a total area of 131.6 square kilometres.
Anaheim is part of California, where the leader is the California State Senate and the California State Capitol is located.
Anderson is part of Lafayette Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Angola, Indiana is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana, United States, where Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
The United States House of Representatives is the leader of Antioch, which is part of Contra Costa County, California, San Francisco Bay Area.
Arlington is part of Tarrant County, Texas, United States. Fort Worth is the county seat of Tarrant County, Texas.
Atlanta is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
The population density of Atlanta is 1299.0 inhabitants per square kilometre and the area code is 404.
Atlantic City, New Jersey, United States is part of New Jersey, the largest city in Newark.
Atlantic City, New Jersey is part of Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States, where the largest city is New York City.
Alabama is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States.
Auburn is part of Washington state, United States. Washington D.C. is the capital of the United States.
Auburn is part of Washington state, United States, where the capital is Olympia.
Atlanta is the capital of Georgia, which is part of the state of Dougherty County, Georgia.
Alexandria is part of Madison County, Indiana, United States, and Anderson is the largest city.
Atlantic City is part of New Jersey, United States. The capital of New Jersey is Trenton.
The largest city in Texas is Houston and the language spoken is English. Arlington is part of Texas.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, in the United States. The capital of the country is Washington DC.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, in the United States. The capital of the country is Washington DC.
Akron, Ohio is located in the United States, where the capital city is Washington D.C. English is spoken and the capital city is Washington D.C.
Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Akron is part of Summit County, Ohio.
Albany is part of Benton County, Oregon, in the United States where one of the ethnic groups is Asian Americans.
Barack Obama is the leader of the United States, where Asian Americans are an ethnic group and Albuquerque, New Mexico is located.
Albany, Georgia is in the United States where English is the language and African Americans are an ethnic group.
Angola, Indiana is located in the United States where English is the language and Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
Aarhus Lufthavn A/S is the operating organisation for Aarhus Airport which has a runway length of 2776.0 metres and a runway name of 10R/28L.
Adirondack Regional Airport serves Lake Placid, New York and Saranac Lake, New York. Its runway length is 2003.0.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Paracuellos de Jarama, part of the community of Madrid in Spain.
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh and operated by the Indian Air Force. The ICAO Location Identifier of the airport is VIAG.
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase in Iraq. The runway length of Al Asad Airbase is 3992.88.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force who were involved in the 1986 United States bombing of Libya. The McDonnell Douglas F-15 Eagle is an aircraft fighter.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force who were involved in the Invasion of Grenada. The McDonnell Douglas F-15 Eagle is an aircraft fighter in the United States Air Force.
Alderney is served by Alderney airport which has a runway length of 877.0 and 1st runway surfaced with poaceae.
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation of the Allama Iqbal International Airport in Pakistan. The headquarters of the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority are in Jinnah International Airport.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Punjab, Pakistan and has a runway length of 2900.0. The runway name is 18L/36R.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County, Michigan, United States and is 210 metres above sea level.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas and is 973 metres above sea level. The runway length is 1773.0.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas and is 973 metres above sea level. It has a runway length of 896 and a runway length of 973.0.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas where the capital is Austin and English is spoken.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the demonym for the inhabitants is Tejano.
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, in Belgium where German is spoken.
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States.
The Atlantic City International Airport is operated by the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey which serves the region of New Jersey. The headquarters of the Port Authority are the Four World Trade Center.
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States and has a runway length of 3048.0.
Allama Iqbal International Airport serves the city of Lahore in Pakistan where Anwar Zaheer Jamali is the leader.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, part of the community of Madrid, where the leader party is Ahora Madrid.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Spain, where the leader party is Ahora Madrid.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los Reyes, Spain, where the leader party is the Peoples Party.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania, United States. Carrol County, Maryland is southeast of Adams County.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County, Pennsylvania. Carrol County, Maryland is southeast of Adams County.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, the capital of which is Baku. The native name of the memorial is Turk Sehitleri Aniti.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, where the legislature is the National Assembly and the leader is Artur Rasizade.
The Atatürk Monument (zmir) is located in Turkey, where the leader is Ahmet Davutoglu and the capital is Ankara.
Guanciale is an ingredient of Amatriciana sauce which comes from the Lazio region of Italy.
Arem-arem is a Javanese dish that contains compressed rice cooked in banana leaf with vegetables or minced meat fillings.
Tomato belongs to the division of flowering plants and the family of solanaceae. It is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Rome, Italy and it includes olive oil.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Rome, Italy and includes tomato.
Asam pedas is a dish from the Malay Peninsula region of Malaysia and has fish cooked in a sour and hot sauce.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the capital is Kuala Lumpur and the leader is Arifin Zakaria.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Indonesia and Malaysia. Malaysian Chinese are an ethnic group from Malaysia.
Bacon sandwiches are variations of the BLT which contains lettuce. The BLT is a variation of the club sandwich.
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and White Americans are an ethnic group.
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is a leader and the capital is Washington DC.
Bread is an ingredient of a bacon sandwich which is a variation of a BLT or club sandwich.
Baked Alaska, which contains sponge cake, is from France and New York.
Baked Alaska is from France where Manuel Valls is a leader and the currency is the euro.
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from New York, United States.
Sponge cake is an ingredient of Baked Alaska which is a dessert. A cookie is also a dessert.
Bakewell pudding originates from the Derbyshire Dales and is served as a dessert. The main ingredients are ground almond, jam, butter and eggs.
Bakewell tart is a variation of Bakewell pudding which originates from the Derbyshire Dales. The main ingredients are ground almond, jam, butter and eggs.
Beef is an ingredient in Bakso which is a dish from Indonesia.
Avocado is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa which is a typical Colombian cuisine from the Paisa region.
Bandeja paisa is a typical Colombian dish from the Paisa region. Hogao is an ingredient in the dish.
Barny cakes can be found in France where Claude Bartolone and Manuel Valls are leaders.
Batchoy is a dish from the Philippines and contains noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp and beef.
Batchoy is a dish from the Philippines and contains vegetables, noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp and beef.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore and Indonesia. Tony Tan is the leader of Singapore.
Sesame oil is an ingredient in beef kway teow which is a popular dish in Indonesia and Singapore.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore and Indonesia. Oyster sauce is an ingredient in beef kway teow.
Bhajji originates from India where the currency is the Indian rupee and the leader is Sumitra Mahajan.
Banana is an ingredient in binignit, a dessert. A cookie is also a dessert.
Sago is an ingredient of binignit, a dessert. A cookie is also a dessert.
Taro is an ingredient in binignit, a dessert. A cookie is also a dessert.
The main ingredients of binignit are sweet potato (of the order Solanales) and banana.
Bionico is a dessert found in Mexico and contains granola.
Bionico is a food found in Guadalajara, Mexico and contains raisins.
Bionico is a food found in Mexico, where the leader is Silvano Aureoles Conejo and the currency is the peso.
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional sauce from Italy, where the capital is Rome and the leader is Pietro Grasso.
Batchoy is eaten in the Philippines where Arabic is spoken and the Igorot people are an ethnic group.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Tony Tan is the leader and English is spoken.
Tomato belongs to the Solanaceae family and is an ingredient of Amatriciana sauce. It is also part of the order Solanales.
The AWH Engineering College in Kerala, India has 250 academic staff.
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore has 700 postgraduate students and is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University.
AWH Engineering College is located in Kerala, which has Mahe, India to its northwest. The leader of Kerala is Kochi.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, where the national anthem is Desteapta-te, romane! and one of the ethnic groups is the Germans of Romania.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania. The country's leader is Klaus Iohannis and one of the ethnic groups is the Germans of Romania.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and is affiliated with the European University Association which has its headquarters in Brussels.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Aarhus, Denmark was established in 1928.
The comic character Asterix was created by Albert Uderzo and the French national René Goscinny.
Tim Brooke-Taylor starred in Bananaman which was broadcast by the BBC on 15 April 1986.
Baymax first appeared in the film Big Hero 6, which was distributed by Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures and starred Scott Adsit.
Baymax is a character in the film Big Hero 6, which starred Scott Adsit. The film is distributed by Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures.
Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6 which starred Ryan Potter and is distributed by Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures.
The comic character Blockbuster, also known as Mark Desmond, was created by Gardner Fox and Carmine Infantino.
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by Dan Mishkin and Gary Cohn.
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by Ernie Colon and Gary Cohn.
103 Colmore Row, Birmingham, has 23 floors and was started in 1973. It was completed in 1976.
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where the capital is Cape Town and the ethnic group is Coloured. Asian South Africans and the Asian South Africans are both ethnic groups.
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, Cuyahoga County, Ohio, United States. The governing body of Cleveland is Cleveland City Council.
250 Delaware Avenue, Buffalo, New York, has 12 floors and a floor area of 30843.8 square metres. It cost 110 million dollars.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, Cook County, Illinois, United States. The leader of Chicago is Rahm Emanuel.
300 North LaSalle, Illinois, has 60 floors and a floor area of 120770.0 square metres. It was completed in 2009.
3Arena is located in Dublin, Leinster, Republic of Ireland. It is owned by Live Nation Entertainment.
The tenant of the AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is Marriott International. The hotel was designed by the architect 3XN and has 23 floors.
Adare Manor is located in Adare, Munster County, Limerick, which is governed by the Limerick City and County Council.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan, which is the location of the Akita Museum of Art in Akita, Akita Prefecture.
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita Prefecture, Japan. One of the ethnic groups in Japan is the Filipinos.
The Vietnamese people are an ethnic group in Japan, where the Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita Prefecture.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan, where the Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita Prefecture.
The College of William and Mary own Alan B Miller Hall, located at 101 Ukrop Way, Williamsburg, Virginia, and completed on 1 June 2009.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Gujarat, India. Narendra Modi and Sumitra Mahajan are leaders in India.
Asilomar Conference Grounds, constructed in 1913, is located in Pacific Grove, California. It was added to the National Register of Historic Places on 27 February 1987 with the reference number 87000823.
Asser Levy Public Baths, constructed in 1904, is located in Avenue A, Manhattan and was added to the National Register of Historic Places on 1980-04-23 with the reference number 80002709.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, which is part of Manhattan and Brooklyn. Cyrus Vance Jr is the leader of Manhattan.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, Manhattan, United States. Gale Brewer is the leader of Manhattan.
103 Colmore Row was designed by the architect John Madin who was born in Birmingham, which has the B postcode. Andrew Mitchell is the leader of Birmingham.
103 Colmore Row was designed by the architect John Madin who was born in Birmingham, which has the B postcode. The leader of Birmingham is the Labour Party (UK).
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Gujarat, India. Anandiben Patel and Sumitra Mahajan are leaders in India.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Gujarat, India. The leader of India is T S Thakur and Narendra Modi.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan, where the Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita Prefecture.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom where the capital city is London. The Parliament of the United Kingdom is the leader of London and 20 Fenchurch Street is located there.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in the United States, where the language is English and the leader is known as the President. Joe Biden is a leader in the United States.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Pennsylvania, United States and was established in 2000. It is categorised as a contributing property.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Baku, the capital of Azerbaijan, where the leader is Prime Minister Artur Rasizade.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, the capital of which is Baku. It is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku and the native name of the memorial is Turk Sehitleri Aniti.
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument was established on 11 July 1907 in the district of the Monocacy National Battlefield in Frederick County, Maryland. The nearest city is Frederick, Maryland.
The bronze Ataturk Monument (zmir) is located in Turkey, where the capital is Ankara and the leader is Ahmet Davutoglu.
The Atatürk Monument (Izmir) was designed by Pietro Canonica and inaugurated on 27 July 1932 in Turkey. The leader of Turkey is called the President of Turkey.
Albany is part of Georgia, U.S., where English is the language and Native Americans are an ethnic group.
Albuquerque, New Mexico has a population density of 1142.3 inhabitants per square kilometre and a total area of land of 486.2 square kilometres. The area code is 505 575.
Alpharetta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S. and is part of the county seat of Atlanta.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and African Americans are an ethnic group.
Austin is the capital of Texas, which is the location of Amarillo, which is part of Potter County, Texas, United States.
Anaheim is part of California, where Spanish is spoken. The leader of California is called the California State Assembly, which is located at the California State Capitol.
Anderson, Indiana is part of Adams Fall Creek, Lafayette Richland Union and has a population density of 523.9 inhabitants per square kilometre. It is 268.0 above sea level and has an elevation of 107.43 square kilometres.
Angola, Indiana, United States, is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County and has a total area of 16.55 square kilometres.
Antioch, California has a UTC offset of -7 and has a population of 102372. It has a total area code of 925 and a total area of 75.324 square kilometres.
The population density of Atlantic City, New Jersey, is 1421.2 inhabitants per square kilometre and the city code is 609. The city is lead by the Mayors of Atlantic City, New Jersey, and has a total area of 44.125 square kilometres.
The Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama.
Alabama is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Pierce County is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States, the capital of which is Washington D.C. and King County is the location of Auburn.
Auburn is part of King County, Washington, United States. The capital of the United States is Washington D.C.
Austin is part of Hays County, Texas, where Houston is the largest city and San Marcos is the county seat.
Anaheim is part of California, where the Chinese language is spoken. The leader of California is the California State Assembly, which is located at the California State Capitol.
Alpharetta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S. and is part of Fulton County, Georgia. Atlanta is the county seat of the Georgia United States.
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is part of Lafayette Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Houston is the largest city in Texas, United States where English is the language spoken. Arlington is part of Texas.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and one of the ethnic groups is African American. Albany is part of Benton County, Oregon.
Atlantic City, New Jersey is part of New Jersey, in the United States. The capital of the United States is Washington DC and the largest city is New York City.
Barack Obama is the President of the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group and Albuquerque, New Mexico is located.
John Sanchez is the leader of the New Mexico Senate, which is lead by the Asian Americans. Albuquerque, New Mexico is home to the United States where one of the ethnic groups is Asian Americans.
Albany is part of Benton County, Oregon, in the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
Barack Obama is the leader of the United States, where the ethnic group is Native Americans. The leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico is the Mayor of Albuquerque.
Albany is part of the United States, where English is the language and Native Americans are an ethnic group.
Angola is part of Indiana, in the United States where English is the language and Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana, United States. English is the language of the United States and Asian Americans are an ethnic group there.
Jens Härtel has been the manager of 1 FC Magdeburg and played for SV Babelsberg 03 and FC Union Berlin. He also plays for FSV Zwickau.
Rolando Maran was born in Italy and has been the manager of AC Chievo Verona. He has played for F.C. Bari 1908 and Carrarese Calcio.
Michele Marcolini was born in Italy and has been manager of AC Lumezzane. He is attached to the club Torino F.C. and plays for A.C. Chievo Verona.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis has 1500 members and their ground is located in Efxeinoupoli. They play in the A EPSTH 2nd GROUP league and their chairman is Antonis Milionis.
The manager of AFC Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for Stockport County FC and is a member of the Conservative Party (UK). The club is located in Blackpool, where the ground is located.
Gordon Marsden is the leader of Blackpool where AFC Blackpool is located. The club is managed by Stuart Parker who plays for Stockport County FC and is a member of the club.
AFC Fylde's full name is "Association Football Club Fylde" and they have 3180 members. They played in the 2014 season at Warton, Fylde, Lancashire.
AFC Fylde (abbreviated to Association Football Club Fylde) has 3180 members and their ground is Bryning Lane.
Paulo Sousa is the manager of ACF Fiorentina and plays for Juventus FC, Maccabi Tel Aviv FC and Inter Milan.
AEK Athens F.C., who have 69618 members, play in the Superleague Greece and competed in the 2014 season.
AFC Ajax (amateurs)'s ground is Sportpark De Toekomst which is owned by AFC Ajax N.V. and tenanted by Jong Ajax.
The full name of AFC Ajax (amateurs) is Amsterdamsche Football Club Ajax Amateurs and they played in the 2014 season. They have 5000 members and the nickname of Joden Godenzonen.
John van den Brom is the manager of AZ Alkmaar. He plays for Vitesse Arnhem and AFC Ajax and the Netherlands national football team.
The ground of Agremiaço Sportiva Arapiraquense is the Estadio Minicipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca, which is located in Alagoas. The club play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série C league, which has Vila Nova Futebol Clube as champions.
Agremiaço Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série C league in Brazil. Their ground is the Estadio Minicipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca which is located in Alagoas.
Agremiaço Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série C league in Brazil. Their ground is the Estadio Minicipal Coaracy da Mata Fonseca which is located in Arapiraca.
St Vincent-St Mary High School is located in Akron, Summit County, Ohio, United States. The ground of Akron Summit Assault is located at the school.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where the capital is Rome and the leaders are Pietro Grasso and Sergio Mattarella.
Peter Stöger is the manager of 1. FC Köln and plays for SK Vorwärts Steyr and FC Admira Wacker Modling. He also plays for FK Austria Wien and manages 1. FC Köln.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene in Texas. It is 546 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 2194.0. The runway name is 17L/35R.
Adirondack Regional Airport serves Lake Placid, New York and Saranac Lake, New York. Its runway length is 2003.0 and it is 507 metres above sea level.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. It is operated by ENAIRE and has a runway name of 18L/36R which is 3500 long.
Agra Airport is located in India and operated by the Indian Air Force. The IATA Location Identifier for the airport is AGR and the ICAO Location Identifier is VIAG.
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase in Iraq. The runway name is 08/26 and it has a length of 3990.0.
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase in Al Anbar Province, Iraq. The runway name is 09R/27L and it has a length of 3990.0.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force who were involved in the Invasion of Grenada. The Lockheed AC-130 attack aircraft is an aircraft fighter and the McDonnell Douglas F-15 Eagle is an aircraft fighter.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Pakistan and serves the city of Lahore. It is operated by the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority and has a runway length of 2900.0.
Amsterdam Airport Schipol serves the city of Amsterdam and is -3.3528 above sea level. The runway name is 09/27 Buitenveldertbaan and it is 2014.0 in length.
Amsterdam Airport Schipol serves the city of Amsterdam and is -3.3528 above sea level. The runway name is 18L/36R 'Aalsmeerbaan' and it is 2014.0 in length.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas and serves the city of Andrews. It is 973 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 929.0.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the capital is Austin and the people are known as Tejano.
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the capital is Austin and English is spoken.
Angola International Airport is located at colo e Bengo, Luanda Province, Angola. The airport serves the city of Luanda.
Antwerp International Airport is owned by the Flemish Region and operated by the Flemish government. It is 12 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 600.0.
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines who have their headquarters in Ashgabat, Turkmenistan. The hub airport for Turkmenistan Airlines is Turkmenbashi International Airport.
Athens International Airport is located in Spata and serves the city of Athens. It is 94 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 3800.
Atlantic City International Airport serves the city of Atlantic City, New Jersey, United States. The airport is located at Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, which is led by Don Guardian.
Atlantic City International Airport is owned by the South Jersey Transportation Authority, which is led by Stephen Dilts. The airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States.
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, Belgium. The leader of Belgium is Charles Michel and German is spoken there.
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, Belgium. The leader of Belgium is Philippe of Belgium and the French language is spoken there.
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Saranac Lake, Essex County, New York.
Al Taqaddum Air Base serves the city of Fallujah, Iraq. Fuad Masum is the leader of Iraq where the Kurdish language is spoken.
Al Taqaddum Air Base serves the city of Fallujah, Iraq. Haider al-Abadi is the leader of Iraq where the Kurdish language is spoken.
Malik Muhammad Rafique Rajwana is the leader of Punjab, Pakistan where Allama Iqbal International Airport serves the city of Lahore.
The surface of the 1st runway at Alderney Airport is poaceae which belongs to the division of flowering plants and belongs to the order of Commelinids. The class of Monocotyledon is Poaceae.
Rona Fairhead is a key person at the BBC which is located in Broadcasting House in London and produces BBC Radio. Bananaman was broadcast by the BBC.
Bananaman first aired on STV on 3 October 1983 and starred Jill Shilling. It was created by Steve Bright.
Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6 which stars Ryan Potter. The character was created by American Duncan Rouleau.
Gary Cohn and Ernie Colon are both Puerto Ricans. The comic character, Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by Gary Cohn and the Puerto Rican national.
Eric Flint, born in Burbank California, wrote 1634: The Bavarian Crisis which was preceded by Grantville Gazette III and DeMarce short stories in the Grantville Gazettes.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Eric Flint, Virginia DeMarce, et al. and has 512 pages. It has the ISBN number 1-4165-2060-0.
The AIDS journal is published in the UK by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins, parent company Wolters Kluwer. Elizabeth II is the leader of the UK.
A Fortress of Grey Ice, written by J.V. Jones, is available in hardcover and has the OCLC number 51969173 and the ISBN number 0-7653-0633-6.
A Loyal Character Dancer was written by Qiu Xiaolong and is available in hardcover. It has the OCLC number 49805501 and the ISBN number 1-56947-301-3.
A Loyal Character Dancer is written in English, which is spoken in Great Britain. It originates from the United States where Native Americans are an ethnic group.
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States where English is the language and Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
A Wizard of Mars, written by Diane Duane, is available in hardcover and has 560 pages. It has the ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2.
Acta Mathematica Hungarica, abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar., is concerned with the academic discipline of Mathematics. It has the LCCN number 83646315 and the ISSN number 0236-5294.
The Acta Palaeontologica Polonica, abbreviated to Acta Palaeontol. Pol., is academically focused on Paleobiology. It has the LCCN number 60040714, the ISSN number 0567-7920 and the ISSN number 0567-7920.
The Polish Academy of Sciences publishes the Acta Palaeontologica Polonica which is abbreviated to Acta Palaeontol. Pol.. It has the ISSN number 1732-2421 and the LCCN number 60040714.
Cornell University is located in New York and is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities and the Association of American Universities. The publisher of Administrative Science Quarterly is Cornell University.
Cornell University, which is located in Ithaca, New York, is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities and publishes Administrative Science Quarterly.
Aenir, written by Garth Nix, has 233 pages and is available in paperback. It has the ISBN number 0-439-17684-0.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is written in English, which is spoken in Great Britain. It originates from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Johns Hopkins University Press is the parent company of Johns Hopkins University in the United States. The American Journal of Mathematics was first published in 1878.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where the language is English, which is spoken in Great Britain. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the US.
A Wizard of Mars was published in English, the language spoken in Great Britain. It was published in the United States where Barack Obama is the leader.
A Wizard of Mars is published in English and is published in the United States. The leader of the United States is Barack Obama and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and English is spoken. English is also spoken in Great Britain.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and English is the language spoken. Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups in the United States.
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and was a United States national. He was selected by NASA in 1963 and spent 100305 minutes in space.
Alan Shepard was a crew member of Apollo 14 operated by NASA. He was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy which ranks higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong, where Chris Patten was a representative. He was a crew member of Apollo 8 alongside Frank Borman.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey and graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963. He was a crew member on Apollo 11. He is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He was selected by NASA in 1963 and served as a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin, born Edwin Eugene Aldrin Jr., was a crew member of NASA's Apollo 11 mission. He won 20 awards.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and died in California. He was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy which ranks higher than Department of Commerce Gold Medal.
Alan Shepard was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the US Navy, which ranks higher than Department of Commerce Gold Medal. He died in California, where Dianne Feinstein is a senator.
Elliot See was born in Dallas and died in St Louis. He attended the University of Texas at Austin.
William Anders was a fighter pilot who was selected by NASA in 1963 to be part of the Apollo 8 crew.
The AWH Engineering College in Kuttikkattoor, India was established in 2001. The Ganges is a river in India.
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090, India. It is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University in Belgaum.
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Bangalore, India. Its director is Dr G P Prabhukumar and it is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University.
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given Technical Campus status by the All India Council for Technical Education in Mumbai. The Institute is governed by the International Tennis Federation and offers tennis as a sport.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Alba County, Romania. Bucharest is the capital of Romania.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus, Denmark. The country's leader is Lars Lokke Rasmussen and the government type is a magistrate.
The AWH Engineering College is located in Kuttikkattoor, Kerala, where the leader is Kochi and there are 250 academic staff.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, where the capital is Bucharest and the national anthem is Desteapta-te, române!. The country has an ethnic group called the Germans of Romania.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania. The capital of Romania is Bucharest and the leader is Klaus Iohannis.
Amatriciana sauce is from the Lazio region of Italy. It includes tomatoes, guanciale, cheese and olive oil.
Arrabbiata sauce is from Italy, where Rome is the capital and Sergio Mattarella and Pietro Grasso are leaders.
Arros negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain. The main ingredients are white rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink and cubanelle peppers.
Arros negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain. The main ingredients are white rice, cuttlefish or squid, cephalopod ink and cubanelle peppers.
Arros negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain. The leader of Catalonia is the Parliament of Catalonia and Spaniards are an ethnic group there.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the Malay and Batak are ethnic groups.
Asam pedas is a dish from Malaysia and Sumatra. Malays and Minangkabau people are ethnic groups from Sumatra.
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups. The capital of the US is Washington D.C.
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is a leader and the capital is Washington DC. Asian Americans are one of the ethnic groups in the country.
Ketchup is an ingredient in a bacon sandwich which comes from the United Kingdom. A variation of a bacon sandwich is a BLT, which is a variation of a club sandwich.
The bacon sandwich is a dish from the United Kingdom and has condiments such as bread and bacon, ketchup or brown sauce. It can also be known as a bacon butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon sanger, piece 'n bacon, bacon cob, bacon barm, or bacon muffin.
Baked Alaska is a dessert from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group and cookies are served as a dessert.
Baked Alaska is from Paris, New York or Hong Kong, United States. Its main ingredients are meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding.
Baked Alaska is from the region of Hong Kong, France, United States or China. The main ingredients are meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding.
Baked Alaska is from Hong Kong, United States. Its main ingredients are meringue, ice cream, sponge cake or Christmas pudding.
Fruit preserves are an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of Bakewell pudding which originates from the Derbyshire Dales region of Derbyshire.
Bakso is a dish from Indonesia, popular in neighbouring Southeast Asian countries and contains ground beef, tapioca, noodle, rice vermicelli, beef broth, kailan, celery, salted vegetables and fried shallots.
Bakso is a dish from Indonesia. It includes ground beef, tapioca, noodle, rice vermicelli, beef broth, kailan, celery, salted vegetables, and fried shallots.
Bandeja paisa is a typical Colombian dish from the Paisa region. The main ingredients are red beans, pork belly, white rice, ground meat, chicharon, fried egg, plantain (patacones), chorizo, arepa, hogao sauce, black pudding (morcilla), avocado and lemon.
Bandeja paisa is a typical Colombian dish from the Paisa region. The main ingredients are red beans, pork belly, white rice, ground meat, chicharon, fried egg, plantain (patacones), chorizo, arepa, hogao sauce, black pudding (morcilla), avocado and lemon.
Barny cakes can be found in France where the French language is spoken and the leaders are Gérard Larcher and Francois Hollande.
Batagor is a dish from Indonesia and is a variation of Siomay and Shumai. Shiitake is an ingredient in Shumai.
Batchoy is a dish from La Paz, Iloilo City, Philippines. The main ingredients are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp, and beef.
Batchoy is a soup dish from the Philippines. The main ingredients are noodles, pork organs, vegetables, chicken, shrimp and beef.
Beef kway teow is a dish popular nationwide in Singapore and Indonesia. Its main ingredients are Kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, sliced, dried black beans, garlic, dark soy sauce, lengkuas, oyster sauce, soya sauce, chilli and sesame oil.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore and Indonesia. Standard Chinese is spoken in Singapore where Halimah Yacob is the leader.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore and Indonesia. Its main ingredients are Kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, sliced, dried black beans, garlic, dark soy sauce, lengkuas, oyster sauce, soya sauce, chilli and sesame oil.
Bhajji originates from the Karnataka region of India. It is also known as Bhaji or bajji and contains vegetables.
Bhajji originates from the Karnataka region. The main ingredients are gram flour and vegetables. The alternative name for Bhaji and bajji are bhajji.
Sweet potato (part of the order Solanales) is a flowering plant and is an ingredient in binignit. Sago is one of the main ingredients.
Binignit is a dish from the region of Visayas, Philippines. It includes coconut milk and sago.
Bionico is a dessert found in Mexico and is from the Jalisco region. Granola is an ingredient in Bionico.
Bionico is a food found in Guadalajara, Mexico. It includes chopped fruits, sour cream, condensed milk, granola, shredded coconut and raisins.
Bionico is a dessert found in Mexico where Silvano Aureoles Conejo is the leader. A cookie is a dessert.
Bakso is a dish from Indonesia, where Jusuf Kalla is the leader. Tapioca is an ingredient in the dish.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Singapore where Tony Tan is the leader. It is also found in Java where the Baduy are an ethnic group.
Batchoy is eaten in the Philippines where Philippine Spanish is spoken and the Ilocano people and Zamboangans are ethnic groups.
Batchoy is eaten in the Philippines where Arabic is spoken and the Zamboangans and Igorot people are ethnic groups.
Binignit is a dessert from the Philippines where the language is Philippine English. A cookie is a dessert.
Sandesh is a dessert, which is served as a dessert. Binignit is a dish from the Philippines where the language is Philippine English.
Virginia DeMarce and Eric Flint are the authors of 1634: The Bavarian Crisis which was preceded by The Grantville Gazette. The book was preceded by the book Ring of Fire II which is written in English.
The Administrative Science Quarterly is published by Cornell University in Ithaca, New York. It is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities and the Association of American Universities. The president of Cornell University is Elizabeth Garrett.
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States where one of the ethnic groups is African American and English is the language spoken in Great Britain.
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States where the language is English, which is spoken in Great Britain. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States where the language is English, which is spoken in Great Britain. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the US.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where the capital is Washington D.C. and the Native Americans are an ethnic group. English is spoken in Great Britain.
The novel Into Battle was written by Australians and preceded by Aenir and Castle. The novel was followed by Above the Veil and The Violet Keystone.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and Asian Americans are an ethnic group. The book is written in English which is the language spoken in Great Britain.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and Asian Americans are an ethnic group. The language of the United States is English, which is also spoken in Great Britain.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was preceded by 1634: The Galileo Affair. The United States is home to many Asian Americans and the capital city is Washington DC. The leader of the US is Barack Obama and the capital city is Washington DC.
1634 The Ram Rebellion was written in the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and the capital city is Washington DC. African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
A Wizard of Mars originates from the United States where the leader is called the President and the language is English, which is spoken in Great Britain. Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Albany is part of the U.S. state of Georgia. The leader of the U.S. is known as the President and Asian Americans are an ethnic group there.
Alpharetta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S. and is part of Fulton County, Georgia. The largest city in the U.S. is Atlanta. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the U.S.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, in the United States. The capital of the United States is Washington DC and the language spoken is English.
Amarillo is located in Potter County, Texas, United States. The capital of Texas is Austin and the language spoken is English.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States. The capital of Texas is Austin and the language spoken is English.
Anderson, Indiana, United States, is part of Fall Creek Township, Madison County, Indiana. It has a population density of 523.9 inhabitants per square kilometre and a total area of 107.43 square kilometres.
The 11th State Assembly district is the district of Antioch, which is part of Contra Costa County, California. The language spoken in California is English and the language is English.
The population density of Atlanta is 1299.0 inhabitants per square kilometre. The area code of Atlanta is 404 and it is 347.1 square kilometres.
Attica, Indiana, United States, is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana. It has a total area of 4.14 square kilometres and an elevation of 166.0 above sea level. It has a population density of 783.1 inhabitants per square kilometre.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and African Americans are an ethnic group there. The country is the location of Auburn, Alabama which is part of Lee County, Alabama.
Auburn, Washington, United States, has a population density of 914.8 inhabitants per square kilometre and is part of Pierce County, King County, Washington.
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where English is spoken and the largest city is Round Rock. Georgetown is the county seat of Williamson County, Texas.
Austin is part of Hays County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston and San Marcos is the county seat. English is spoken in Texas.
San Marcos is the county seat of Austin, Texas, which is part of Hays County, Texas. Houston is the largest city in Texas, where Spanish is spoken and the largest city is Houston.
The capital of Indiana is Indianapolis, the capital of which is Madison County, Indiana, United States. English Americans are spoken in the state.
Texas is part of Tarrant County, Texas. Houston is the largest city in Texas, where Spanish is spoken and the largest city is Houston. Spanish is the language spoken in Texas.
Austin is the capital of Texas which is part of Tarrant County, Texas, United States. Austin is the capital of Texas.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and White Americans are an ethnic group there. Atlantic City is part of New Jersey in the United States.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and Native Americans are an ethnic group there. Albany is part of Linn County, Oregon, in the United States.
The capital of the United States is Washington DC and the Americans are an ethnic group. Albany is part of Oregon, in the United States.
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, in the United States where English is the language and African Americans are an ethnic group.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States. The country is the location of Auburn, Alabama which is part of the state of Alabama.
Opelika is the county seat of Lee County, Alabama, United States. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
New Jersey is part of New Jersey, United States. The largest city in Newark, New Jersey, is Trenton, and the largest city is New Jersey. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
The leader of the United States is called the President and the language is English. Albuquerque is part of New Mexico in the United States.
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, in the United States where the language is English and the Asian Americans are an ethnic group.
Barack Obama is the leader of the United States, where the capital city is Washington D.C. Native Americans are an ethnic group. Akron is part of Summit County, Ohio, in the United States.
The leader of the United States is known as the President and the ethnic group is African American. Albany is part of the United States and is part of the US.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located at Seminary Ridge, Gettysburg, Pennsylvania, United States. It was established in 2000 and is categorised as a contributing property.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania, which has Cumberland County to its north and Carrol County, Maryland to its southeast. The Monument is categorised as a contributing property.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. The memorial is located in Baku, the capital of Azerbaijan, where the leader is Prime Minister Artur Rasizade.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. The capital of Azerbaijan is Baku and its leader is Artur Rasizade. The legislature of Azerbaijan is the National Assembly.
The Atatürk Monument (zmir) is located in Turkey, where the capital is Ankara and the leader is known as the President. The leader of Turkey is Ahmet Davutoglu and the largest city is Istanbul.
The AWH Engineering College in Kuttikkattoor, Kerala, India was established in 2001 and has 250 academic staff. Kerala has Mahe, India to its northwest.
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090. Its director is Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar and it has 700 postgraduate students. It is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University.
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, India is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University and has 700 postgraduate students. The president of the Institute is B.M. Reddy.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Denmark, which is affiliated with the European University Association headquartered in Brussels. Denmark's leader is called the Monarchy of Denmark and Lars Lokke Rasmussen is the leader.
The AWH Engineering College in Kuttikkattoor, India was established in 2001. The College has 250 academic staff. Mumbai is the largest city in India.
The Ganges is a river in India, where the largest city is Mumbai. The leader of Kerala is Kochi and the AWH Engineering College is located in the state of Kerala.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Aarhus, Denmark was established in 1928 and has 737 academic staff. Denmark's leader is Lars Lokke Rasmussen.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus, which has Mols to its northeast. It is affiliated with the European University Association which has its headquarters in Brussels. Aarhus has a magistrate government.
Baymax, a character in Big Hero 6 starring Alan Tudyk, was created by the American Duncan Rouleau and Steven T Seagle.
Michele Marcolini is the manager of AC Lumezzane, who have their ground in Italy. He has played for Vicenza Calcio and is a member of the F.C. Bari 1908. The leader of Italy is Pietro Grasso.
The manager of AFC Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for Chesterfield FC and Stockport County FC. He is also a member of the Labour Party (UK).
A.S. Gubbio 1910's ground is in Italy, where the Italian language is spoken and the champions are S.S. Robur Siena. The club play in Serie D. The leader of Italy is Sergio Mattarella.
AEK Athens FC have their ground at the Olympic Stadium (Athens) in Marousi. They play for Chelsea FC and manage the club.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where the capital is Rome and the people are called Italians. The country is lead by Pietro Grasso and the language spoken is Italian.
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where the official language is Italian and the capital is Rome. The leader of the country is Sergio Mattarella and the people who live there are called Italians.
Arem-arem is a dish from Indonesia, but is more specific to Java. Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia, where the currency is the Indonesian rupiah and the language is Indonesian.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the capital is Kuala Lumpur and the Malaysian Chinese are ethnic groups. The dish is from the Sumatra and Malay Peninsula regions.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the capital is Kuala Lumpur and the Malaysian Indian are an ethnic group. The dish is from the region of Sumatra and the Malay Peninsula.
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the capital is Kuala Lumpur and the Malaysian Indian are ethnic groups. Asam pedas is a dish from Sumatra and Malaysian Malay.
Asam pedas is a food found in the Malay Peninsula, Malaysia. Abu Zahar Ujang is the leader of Malaysia and Malaysian Indian are an ethnic group from Malaysia.
The Bacon Explosion is a dish from the Kansas City metropolitan area in the United States. The main ingredients are bacon and sausage.
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Paul Ryan is a leader and the capital is Washington DC. English is the language spoken in the United States, where White Americans are an ethnic group and the capital is Washington DC.
The bacon sandwich is a variation of the BLT and is popular in the UK. Its main ingredients are bread and bacon with ketchup or brown sauce as a condiment. It can also be known as a bacon butty, bacon sarnie, rasher sandwich, bacon sanger, piece 'n bacon, bacon cob, bacon barm, or bacon muffin.
Baked Alaska is from Hong Kong and is from France where the French language is spoken. Manuel Valls and Gérard Larcher are leaders in France.
Lemon is part of the rutaceae family and belongs to the Rosids order of Rosids. It is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa which is found in the Antioquia Department, Colombia.
Barny cakes, made with sponge cake, come from France where the French language is spoken. The leader of France is Gérard Larcher and the leader is Francois Hollande.
Batagor is a variation of the Siomay dish, which contains peanut sauce and is a variation of Shumai. The leader of Indonesia is Joko Widodo.
Batagor is a variation of the Siomay dish and Shumai which contains Shiitake. It is also a variation of the Siomay dish. Joko Widodo is the leader of Indonesia.
Batagor is a variation of Siomay and Shumai, which contains Shiitake. It is a dish from Indonesia, where Jusuf Kalla is the leader.
Bhajji originates from the Karnataka region of India. The main ingredients are gram flour and vegetables. The alternative name for Bhaji or bajji.
Bhajji originates from the Karnataka region of India. The leader of India is Vajubhai Vala and the people are called Indians. T. S. Thakur and the people are known as Indians.
Bhajji originates from the Karnataka region of India. T. S. Thakur and Sumitra Mahajan are leaders in India.
Bionico is a dessert from Guadalajara, Mexico. It includes chopped fruits, sour cream, condensed milk, granola, shredded coconut and raisins.
Bionico is a dessert found in Mexico where Spanish is spoken and Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader. Honey is a variation of the dish and it can be served as a dessert.
Bionico is a dessert found in Mexico, where Silvano Aureoles Conejo is the leader. Honey is a variation of the dish and it is also served as a dessert.
Arros negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain. The leader of the country is Carles Puigdemont and the leader of the country is Felipe VI. Spaniards are an ethnic group in the country.
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional sauce from Italy, where the capital is Rome and the language is Italian. Matteo Renzi and Laura Boldrini are leaders in Italy.
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional sauce from Italy where the capital is Rome and the people are known as Italians. The leader of Italy is Sergio Mattarella and Laura Boldrini.
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional Italian sauce from Italy where the capital is Rome and the leaders are Pietro Grasso and Matteo Renzi.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Java, where the Javanese people are an ethnic group. It includes fried chicken and is found nationwide and also in Malaysia and Singapore.
Ayam penyet is a dish from Singapore where English is spoken and Tony Tan is the leader. The Javanese people are an ethnic group in Java.
Batchoy is eaten in the Philippines where the language is Philippine Spanish and Arabic. The Zamboangans and Chinese Filipino are ethnic groups from the Philippines.
Ajoblanco is from Andalusia, Spain, where Susana Diaz is the leader and Spaniards are an ethnic group. Spanish is spoken in Spain.
Ajoblanco is from Andalusia, Spain. The leader of Andalusia is Susana Diaz and the people of Spain are called Spaniards. Felipe VI is the leader of Spain.
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and is a US national. He was selected by NASA in 1963 as a test pilot and is now retired.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and served as a crew member on the NASA operated Apollo 14 mission. He was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy which ranks higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and was a crew member of Apollo 8 operated by NASA. Frank Borman was the commander of Apollo 8 and Frank Borman was the commander.
American Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He served as a fighter pilot and was a crew member of Apollo 11.
American Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He was a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and served as a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11. He is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He was a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA and was a backup pilot of Apollo 11, which was operated by NASA. William Anders is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20th, 1930 and was a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA. William Anders was a backup pilot on Apollo 11. He is now retired.
Alan Shepard was a crew member of NASA's Apollo 14 mission. He died in California, where Dianne Feinstein is a senator. Benitoite is a gemstone.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and died in California. He was an American who was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the US Navy which ranks higher than Department of Commerce Gold Medal.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and was a fighter pilot. He was a crew member of Apollo 8 and retired on September 1st, 1969.
Margrethe II is the leader of Denmark where the Faroese language is spoken. Tirstrup is part of the Central Denmark region and is the location of Aarhus Airport.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos de Jarama, San Sebastián de los Reyes and Alcobendas. It is operated by ENAIRE and is 610 metres above sea level. The runway name is 14L/32R and it has a length of 4500.
Agra Airport is located in India and operated by the Indian Air Force. It is 167.94 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 1818. The airport's ICAO location identifier is VIAG.
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase in Iraq. The airbase has a runway length of 3990.0 and the ICAO location identifier is ORAA. The runway name is 08/26.
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase in Al Anbar Province, Iraq. The airbase has the ICAO location identifier of ORAA and the runway name is 08/26. The airbase has a length of 3992.88.
The United States Air Force, which operates Al Asad airbase, is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase. The Lockheed AC-130 is an attack aircraft and the Boeing C-17 Globemaster III is a transport aircraft. The United States Air Force fought in the 1986 bombing of Libya and deploys the General Dynamics F-16 Fighting Falcon aircraft fighter.
The United States Air Force, which operates Al Asad airbase, fought in the Invasion of Grenada and Operation Enduring Freedom. They deploy the Lockheed AC-130 attack aircraft and the Lockheed C-130 Hercules transport aircraft.
Alderney is served by Alderney airport which is 88 metres above sea level. The 1st runway is made of poaceae and has a length of 733.0. The runway name is 08/26.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Pakistan and serves the city of Lahore. The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for the airport. The runway name is 18L/36R and it has a length of 3310.0.
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Punjab, Pakistan and serves the city of Lahore. The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for the airport. The runway name is 18R/36L and it is 2900.0 in length.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County, Michigan, United States and serves the city of Alpena. It is 210 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 1533.0.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County, Michigan. It serves the city of Alpena, Michigan and is 210 metres above sea level. The runway name is 7/25 and it has a length of 1533.0.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan and serves Alpena, Michigan. It is 210 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 2744.0. The runway name is 1/19.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan, United States. It is 210 metres above sea level and has a runway length of 1533.0.
Angola International Airport is located in colo e Bengo and serves Luanda. It is 159 metres above sea level and has a runway named 05L/23R with a length of 3800.
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens in Greece. The leaders of Greece are Alexis Tsipras and Nikos Voutsis. The language spoken in Greece is Greek.
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens in Greece. The leaders of Greece are Alexis Tsipras and Prokopis Pavlopoulos. The language spoken in Greece is Greek.
Atlantic City International Airport serves the city of Atlantic City, New Jersey which is part of New Jersey in the United States. The leader of Atlantic City is Don Guardian.
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, Belgium. The capital of Belgium is Brussels and the leader of Belgium is Philippe of Belgium. The country is led by Charles Michel and the leader of the country is Philippe of Belgium.
KACY is the ICAO Location Identifier of Atlantic City International Airport which is located in Egg Harbor Township, Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States.
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Lake Placid, New York and Saranac Lake, Harrietstown, New York, United States.
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Lake Placid and Saranac Lake, part of Harrietstown, Essex County, New York, United States.
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundelkhand. The Indian Air Force operates the airport and has the HAL Light Combat Helicopter as an aircraft.
Ram Naik is the leader of Uttar Pradesh which is part of Bundelkhand and is the location of Agra Airport. The airport is operated by the Indian Air Force which uses the HAL Light Combat Helicopter.
Al Taqaddum Air Base serves the city of Fallujah in Iraq. Haider al-Abadi and Fuad Masum are leaders in Iraq where Arabic is spoken.
200 Public Square was completed in 1985 in Cleveland, Cuyahoga County, Ohio, United States.
250 Delaware Avenue, Buffalo, New York, has 12 floors and a floor area of 30843.8 square metres. The building was started in January 2014 and has a postmodern style of architecture.
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, Illinois, United States. The leader of Chicago is Rahm Emanuel and the capital is Springfield.
Marriott International was founded in Washington DC and is the tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, Denmark. The country's leader is Margrethe II and the Faroese language is spoken.
Bill Marriott is a key person at Marriott International which was founded in Washington DC. The AC Hotel Bella Sky is located in Copenhagen, Denmark, where Greenlandic is the language spoken.
The tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is Marriott International which was founded in Washington DC. The Greenlandic language is spoken in Denmark and Lars Lokke Rasmussen is the leader of Denmark.
The architect Augustus Pugin was born in Bloomsbury, Republic of Ireland. He designed the Palace of Westminster and is the home to the historic building of the Adare Manor. Enda Kenny is the leader of the Republic of Ireland.
The Government of Addis Ababa are the current tenants of Addis Ababa City Hall which was started in 1961 and completed in 1964. It has a floor area of 140000.0 square metres and a height of 42 metres.
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita Prefecture, Japan. It has 3 floors and is located at 1-4-2 Nakadori.
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita Prefecture, Japan. The leader of Japan is Taro Aso and one of the ethnic groups in Japan is the Chinese people.
The Mason School of Business is located in the United States and is the owner of the Alan B Miller Hall which was designed by Robert A M Stern. The current tenants are the College of William and Mary and the building is located in Virginia.
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India. Gujarat is led by the Gujarat Legislative Assembly and Sumitra Mahajan.
Ampara Hospital is located in Ampara District, Eastern Province, Sri Lanka. Austin Fernando is the leader of the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka where Ranil Wickremesinghe is a leader.
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, where the leader is Ranil Wickremesinghe and the governing body is the Eastern Provincial Council. Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte is the capital of Sri Lanka.
Julia Morgan was born in San Francisco and designed the Asilomar Conference Grounds, the Los Angeles Herald Examiner Building, Hearst Castle and Asilomar State Beach.
Julia Morgan was born in San Francisco and was the architect of the grounds of Asilomar Conference. She also designed significant buildings including the Riverside Art Museum and Hearst Castle.
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New Netherland, United States. Manhattan is part of New Netherland and Cyrus Vance Jr. is the leader of Manhattan.
103 Colmore Row was designed by the architect John Madin who was born in Birmingham, which has the B postcode. The leader of Birmingham is Labour politician John Clancy and the governing body is Birmingham City Council.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in the United States, where the capital city is Washington DC and Barack Obama is the leader. John Roberts is the leader of the United States, where the leader is called the President.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located at Seminary Ridge, Adams County, Pennsylvania, United States. It was established in 2000 and is categorised as a contributing property.
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania, which has Franklin County to its west and Cumberland County to its north. Carrol County, Maryland is to its southeast and Frederick County, Maryland is to its southwest.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, the capital of which is Baku. It is made of red granite and white marble and dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. The designers of the memorial are Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner. Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, where Artur Rasizade is the leader. It is made of red granite and white marble and dedicated to the Ottoman Army soldiers killed in the Battle of Baku. It is also known locally as Turk Sehitleri Aniti and is designed by Huseyin Butuner and Hilmi Guner.
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the Monocacy National Battlefield in Frederick County, Maryland, United States. It was established on 11 July 1907 and is categorised as a historic district.
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas on March 15th, 1932. He was a US national and served as a test pilot. He spent 100305 minutes in space. He is now retired.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and died in California. He was a crew member of the NASA operated Apollo 14 and was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy which ranks higher than the Department of Commerce Gold Medal.
Alan Bean was born Alan LaVern Bean and was a crew member of NASA's Apollo 12 mission. He retired in June 1981. Alfred Worden was the backup pilot and David Scott was the commander.
American Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and was selected by NASA in 1963. He served as a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin was born on 20 January 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and was a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA. William Anders was a backup pilot on the Apollo 11 mission.
American Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He was a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA. William Anders was a backup pilot.
Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963. He was selected by NASA in 1963 and served as a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 11.
Alan Shepard was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the US Navy, which ranks higher than Department of Commerce Gold Medal. He died in California, where Dianne Feinstein is the senator. Benitoite is a gemstone found in California.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and graduated from AFIT in 1962 with an M.S. He served as a fighter pilot and was a crew member on Apollo 8. He retired on September 1st 1969.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and retired on September 1st 1969. He was a crew member of NASA's Apollo 8 where Buzz Aldrin was a backup pilot and Frank Borman were a crew member.
William Anders graduated from AFIT in 1962 with an M.S. He was a crew member of NASA's Apollo 8 where Buzz Aldrin was a backup pilot and Frank Borman were a crew member. William Anders is now retired.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio in Ticino, Switzerland was established in 1996. Its dean is Mario Botta and it has 100 academic staff.
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090, Karnataka, India. It has 700 postgraduate students and it is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University.
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, India was established in 2000. Its president is B.M. Reddy and it is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University. The campus is located at In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hessarghatta Main Road, Bangalore – 560090.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Denmark, which is led by Lars Lokke Rasmussen and is affiliated with the European University Association headquartered in Brussels. Denmark's leader is called the Monarchy of Denmark and the religion is the Church of Denmark.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus, Denmark. It is affiliated with the European University Association which has its headquarters in Brussels. The leader of Denmark is Lars Lokke Rasmussen and the dean is Thomas Pallesen.
The AWH Engineering College in Kerala, India was established in 2001. The Ganges is a river in India, where the largest city is Mumbai. The leader of Kerala is Kochi.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania. The country's capital is Bucharest and its patron saint is Andrew the Apostle. The country's ethnic group is the Germans of Romania and its anthem is Desteapta-te, romane!
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Aarhus, Denmark was established in 1928 and has 737 academic staff. The school has 16000 students and is led by Lars Lokke Rasmussen.
The Atatürk Monument (Izmir) is made of bronze and was inaugurated on 27 July 1932. It is located in Turkey, where the capital city is Ankara and the currency is the Turkish Lira. The leader of Turkey is Ahmet Davutoglu and the largest city is Istanbul.
The Ataturk Monument (Izmir) was designed by Pietro Canonica and was inaugurated on 27 July 1932 in bronze. The monument is located in Turkey, where the capital is Ankara and the leader is known as the President. Ahmet Davutoglu is the leader of Turkey, where the Ataturk Monument is located and the monument is made of Pietro Canonica.
The Atatürk Monument (Izmir) is located in Turkey, where the capital is Ankara and the currency is the Turkish Lira. The leader of Turkey is known as the President of Turkey, Ahmet Davutoglu and the largest city is Istanbul. The monument was inaugurated on 27 July 1932.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio in Mendrisio, Switzerland was established in 1996. It has 100 academic staff and 600 students. Its dean is Mario Botta. The country's leader is the Federal Chancellor of Switzerland.
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, Karnataka, India was established in 2000. Its president is B.M. Reddy and its director is Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar. The motto of the Institute is "Nurturing Excellence".
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Karnataka, which has Telangana to its northeast and the Arabian Sea to its west, was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All India Council for Technical Education in Mumbai. The Institute offers tennis which is governed by the International Tennis Federation.
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania. Romania's capital is Bucharest and its ethnic group is the Germans of Romania. The leader of Romania is Prime Minister Klaus Iohannis and the national anthem is Desteapta-te, române!
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Aarhus, Denmark was established in 1928 and has 737 academic staff. The school is affiliated with the European University Association and its dean is Thomas Pallesen. Denmark's leader is Lars Lokke Rasmussen.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus, Denmark. It is affiliated with the European University Association which has its headquarters in Brussels. Denmark's leader is called the Monarchy of Denmark and the country is led by Lars Lokke Rasmussen. Aarhus government type is a magistrate.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Aarhus, Denmark was established in 1928 and has 16000 students. Its dean is Thomas Pallesen and its Latin name is "Universitas Aarhusiensis".
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas on March 15, 1932. He graduated from UT Austin in 1955 with a B.S. He was a test pilot and a crew member of Apollo 12. He is now retired.
Alan Shepard was born on November 18th, 1923 in New Hampshire. He graduated from NWC with an MA in 1957 and was selected by NASA in 1959. He served as a test pilot and died in California.
Alan Bean was a US national who was born in Wheeler, Texas. He was a test pilot and a crew member of NASA's Apollo 12 mission. David Scott was the commander of Apollo 12 and Alfred Worden was the backup pilot.
Edwin E. Aldrin Jr. was also known as Buzz Aldrin who was born on January 20th, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and was selected by NASA in 1963 as a fighter pilot. He was a crew member on Apollo 11.
American Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and served as a fighter pilot. He was a crew member of Apollo 11. He spent 52 minutes in space and was a crew member of Apollo 11.
Buzz Aldrin was born on 20 January 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and was a crew member on Apollo 11. He has now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born on January 20, 1930 in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He was selected by NASA in 1963 and served as a crew member on Apollo 11. He is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with a Sc.D in 1963 and was a crew member of Apollo 11 operated by NASA. William Anders was a backup pilot. He is now retired.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on October 17th 1933. He was a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 8. He retired on September 1st 1969.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong and was a member of the Apollo 8 crew operated by NASA. He retired on September 1st 1969. Buzz Aldrin was a backup pilot on the Apollo 8 mission and Frank Borman was a crew member.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on October 17th 1933. He was a fighter pilot and a crew member of Apollo 8. He retired on September 1st 1969.
Aaron S Daggett won the Purple Heart award.
Aaron S. Daggett was involved in the Battle of Mine Run.
Ab Klink was born in Stellendam, Netherlands.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub is in office while Vice President Tuanku Bujang Tuanku Othman.
Abdul Taib Mahmud is parti Bumiputera Sarawak.
Abdul Taib Mahmud is the successor of Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was active on the 29th of July 1999.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State.
The active year of Abner W. Sibal was ended on the 3rd of January 1965.
Abner W Sibal died in Alexandria, Virginia.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent.
Adam Holloway's residence is Gravesend.
Adenan Satem's alma mater is the University of Adelaide.
Adolf Scharf was born in Mikulov.
Adonis Georgiadis is in office while Prime Minister Antonis Samaras is there.
Adonis Georgiadis' office is located in the city and served as Deputy Minister for Development Competitiveness and Shipping.
Agnes Kant was born in Hessisch Oldendorf.
Agnes Ward White was born in Marietta, Ohio.
Airey Neave was started on June 30th, 1953.
Airey Neave has won the Military Cross award.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London.
Airey Neave has a Lieutenant colonel rank.
Airey Neave was started in 1935.
Albert B White is a member of the Republican Party (United States).
Albert B White's spouse is Agnes Ward White.
Albert Jennings Fountain is a member of the Union Army.
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina.
Alberto Teisaire served as a Rear Admiral in the Argentine Navy.
Alfons Gorbach died in Austria.
Alfred Moore Scales began working on the date of 1875-03-04.
Alfred Moore Scales was involved in the Battle of Chancellorsville.
Alfred N Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut.
Alfred N Phillips' office was at, worked as Mayor of Stamford, Connecticut.
Allan Shivers began on January 21st, 1947.
Allan Shivers is a member of the United States Army's military branch.
Allan Shivers was succeeded by Price Daniel.
Alvah Sabin was started on March 04th, 1853.
Alvah Sabin is a member of the Whig Party in the United States.
Robert E. Lee is the commander of the American Civil War.
The language of Austria is Austrian German.
Robert E Lee is the commander of Battle of Antietam.
Battle of Cold Harbor is part of the American Civil War.
Gabriela Michetti is the leader of Buenos Aires.
The commander of the Gulf War is Colin Powell.
John F. Kennedy's predecessor was Dwight D. Eisenhower.
Josef Klaus graduated from the University of Vienna.
Juan Carlos I of Spain was preceded by Francisco Franco.
The Labour Party (Argentine) is the party of Juan Perón.
The leader of the Netherlands is Mark Rutte.
The Spanish-American War was a battle in the United States Army.
William M. O. Dawson was born in Bloomington, Maryland.
The alternative name for 1955 Dodge is Dodge Coronet.
The 1955 Dodge has a motor of 230 cubic inches.
The christening date of A-Rosa Luna was 2005-04-07.
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock.
AIDAluna is operated by AIDA Cruises.
The christening date of AIDAstella was 2013-03-16.
AIDAstella was completed on 11 March 2013.
AIDAstella's maiden Voyage was born on July 17th, 2013 and was a part of the year.
AIDAstella is operated by AIDA Cruises.
ALV X-1 is the launch site of the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport.
American Motors Matador is also known as AMC Matador.
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo V-2 is in the Netherlands and was sold on 1 April 1948.
Abarth 1000 GT Coupe has a straight-four engine.
The Honda K engine is the engine of Acura TLX.
The layout of Acura TLX is AWD vehicle.
The Acura TLX is related to the Honda Accord.
Acura TLX is a 9-speed ZF 9HP automatic V6 transmission.
The assembly of Alfa Romeo 164 is Arese.
The related means of transportation is the Lancia, Alfa Romeo 164.
Alfa Romeo 164 is a 4-speed automatic ZF 4HP18QE transmission.
Alhambra is built by Samuda Brothers.
Alhambra's ship Beam is 8.3 m.
Alhambra is now Wrecked.
Alhambra's top speed is 18.52.
Alvis Speed 25 is a straight-six engine.
Alvis Speed 25 was started in 1937.
The American submarine NR-1 is 4.6 m long.
The final flight of Antares rocket was 2014-10-28.
The launch site of Antares rocket is the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0.
Gabriela Michetti is the leader of Argentina.
Ariane 5 was launched at the Guiana Space Centre.
Ariane 5 was a maiden flight on the 11th of August 2005.
Aston Martin V8 is made of Convertible.
Aston Martin V8 is made by Aston Martin.
Aston Martin Virage is a product of Aston Martin.
Atlas II was completed on the 16th of March 1998.
The launch site of Atlas II is Vandenberg Air Force Base.
Audi was founded by August Horch.
Audi A1 is a prototype of Audi Brussels.
The related means of transportation for Audi A1 is SEAT Ibiza.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois.
Costa Crociere is located in Genoa.
DeSoto Custom has a related Mean Of Transportation to Chrysler Newport.
Fiat Croma has a related means of transport, Alfa Romeo 164.
Germans are the people of Germany.
The leader of Germany is Norbert Lammert.
Stanislaw Tillich is the leader of Germany.
Gruppo Bertone was founded by Giovanni Bertone.
The headquarters of the Guiana Space Centre are located in Kourou, French Guiana.
Honda K is a Honda K engine.
The Star-Spangled Banner is a United States anthem.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
A.C. Milan's chairman is Silvio Berlusconi.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada.
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen.
Abel Hernandez plays for the Uruguay Olympic football team.
Abel Hernandez plays for the Uruguay national football team.
Abner, a footballer, was born in Brazil.
Adam Maher was born in Diemen.
Adam Maher was born in the Netherlands.
Adam Maher played for the Netherlands national under-17 football team.
Adam Maher plays for PSV Eindhoven.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad is part of the Iraq national football team.
Akeem Adams was born in Point Fortin.
Akeem Dent was a member of the Atlanta Falcons team.
Akeem Priestley plays for Connecticut Huskies.
Al-Khor Sports Club play in the Qatar Stars League.
Al-Zawra'a SC is managed by Basim Qasim.
Al Kharaitiyat SC is in the Qatar Stars League.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra was born in Baghdad.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra is in the Sanat Mes Kerman F.C. club.
Alan Martin is a footballer at Hamilton Academical F.C.
Alan Martin is a footballer who plays for the Scotland national under-19 football team.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born on the 2nd of September 1995.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. is in the Florida Panthers club.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. has a height of 1.905.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. played in the National Hockey League.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on February 24, 1989.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Amkar Perm.
Aleksandre Guruli was born in Batumi.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for the Georgia national under-21 football team.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.S. Roma.
Alessio Romagnoli is a youth club at A.S. Roma.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba.
Alex Tyus plays in the Turkish Basketball Super League.
Atlanta Falcons is located in the city of Atlanta.
The general manager of Boston Bruins is Don Sweeney.
Budapest is in Hungary.
English is the language of Canada.
The language spoken in Canada is Slavey.
Columbus Blue Jackets is located in Columbus, Ohio.
Oleh Luzhny is the manager of FC Karpaty Lviv.
Valery Petrakov is the manager of FC Torpedo Moscow.
The chairman of Ferencvarosi TC is Gabor Kubatov.
Finnish is the language spoken in Finland.
Daniele Zoratto is the coach of the Italy national under-16 football team.
Maccabi Ashdod B.C. coach is Zvi Sherf.
The ground of Motherwell F.C. is Fir Park.
Olympique Lyonnais is owned by Jean-Michel Aulas.
St. Louis Rams is located in St. Louis.
Tennessee Titans are located in Nashville, Tennessee.
Aaron Bertram started in 1998.
Aaron Deer is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist The Horns of Happiness.
Aaron Deer is the record label for Kill Rock Stars.
Aaron Turner is a fan of Avantgarde Metal.
Aaron Turner is a progressive metal character.
Abradab's background is as a solo singer.
Abradab was born on November 12, 1978.
Abradab was born in Poland.
Abradab is a genre of Hip Hop music.
Agustin Barboza is a genre of Guarania music.
Ahmet Ertegun was born in Istanbul, Turkey.
Alan Frew is a rock music genre.
Albennie Jones is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Sammy Price.
Aleksandra Kovac's background is as solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in Yugoslavia.
Aleksandra Kovac is in the genre Rhythm and Blues.
Aleksandra Kovac is a genre of soul music.
Alex Day is a genre of Synthpop.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Hector Numa Moraes.
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Montevideo.
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Uruguay.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is on the RCA Records label.
Alison O'Donnell started in 1963.
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz character.
Alison O'Donnell's instrument is the voice bodhran percussion autoharp.
Allen Forrest was born on February 4th, 1981.
Allen Forrest is a genre of Pop music.
Alligator Records is located in Chicago.
Anders Osborne is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Johnny Sansone.
Anders Osborne plays in Rhythm and Blues.
Anders Osborne's record label is Alligator Records.
Andra singer is in the genre of Rhythm and Blues.
Andrew Rayel started in 2009 and has an active year.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Christian Burns.
Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova.
Marry Banilow is an associated Band/associated Musical Artist with Andrew White.
Andrew White is a musician who has the record label B-Unique Records.
Asuncion is part of Gran Asuncion.
Christian Burns is an instrument of guitar.
The music subgenre of hip hop is Gangsta rap.
The stylistic origin of Hip Hop music is Funk.
Indie rock is a style of New wave music.
Manchester is part of Greater Manchester.
Polydor Records is located in London.
RCA Records is a distribution company for Sony Music Entertainment.
The style of rock and roll is blues.
The stylistic origin of Synthpop is Pop music.
The demonym for the people of the United Kingdom is British.
The VK8 is 2.0 gramPerCubicCentimetres and was designed in 19255, 1994.
Carl A. Wirtanen is the discoverer of 29075 1950 DA.
The 410777 2009 FD has an absolute Magnitude of 22.1.
410777 2009 FD has the apoapsis of 259776702.47055 km.
66063 1998 RO1 has an apoapsis of 254989570.60815 km.
66063 1998 RO1 was published on the 4th of November 2013 and was a member of the epoch.
1000 Piazzia is 0.0252 km per second.
1001 Gaussia was previously known as OAA907 XC.
1001 Gaussia has a maximum temperature of 165.0 kelvins.
101 Helena has apoapsis of 441092000.0 kilometres.
101 Helena was epoch 2006-12-31.
101 Helena has a mass of 3.0 kilograms.
1036 Ganymed has a average speed of 16.86 km per second.
103 Hera has the absolute Magnitude of 7.66.
103 Hera has a mass of 7.9 kilograms.
107 Camilla has the absolute Magnitude of 7.08.
A. Storrs is the discoverer of 107 Camilla.
1089 Tama's former name is A894 VA; A904 VD.
1089 Tama has an orbital period of 1202.846 days.
1097 Vicia has a average speed of 17.92 km per second.
1097 Vicia was epoch 2006-12-31.
1097 Vicia has a rotation period of 95040.0.
109 Felicitas was found by Christian Heinrich Friedrich Peters.
109 Felicitas has a periapsis of 283326000000.0.
10 Hygiea has a average speed of 16.76 km per second.
1101 Clematis has a periapsis of 445895000000.0.
110 Lydia was in the epoch 2006-12-31.
11264 Claudiomaccone has a temperature of 173.0 kelvins.
James Craig Watson graduated from the University of Michigan.
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham.
The Purple Heart award for Aaron S. Daggett is the Purple Heart. He was involved in the Battle of Fredericksburg.
The Purple Heart award for Aaron S. Daggett is the Purple Heart. He was involved in the Battle of Gettysburg.
Stephen Yong Kuet Tze is the Deputy of Abdul Rahman Ya'kub, who is now a successor to Abdul Rahman Ya'kub.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna and graduated from the Technical Institute Kaduna.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State and worked as Chief of the Defence Staff.
Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was appointed as Chief of the Defence Staff, was appointed to the office of the Chief of the Defence Staff, Nigeria. He was succeeded by Al-Amin Daggash.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born on the 29th of July 1999 and is now a successor to Olusegun Obasanjo.
Olusegun Obasanjo is the successor of Abdulsalami Abubakar who is vice president Mike Akhigbe.
Abner W Sibal was a commander of World War II, where Joseph Stalin was a commander.
Abner W Sibal is a member of the United States Army who were involved in the Korean War.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and graduated from Magdalene College, Cambridge.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and is now living in Gravesend.
Adam Koc was awarded the Virtuti Militari award for his battles in World War I.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens and served as Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece and is from Athens.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece and served as Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally.
Agnes Kant was born in Hessisch Oldendorf and worked as a Parliamentary group leader.
Airey Neave, which is awarded the Military Cross, is part of the Royal Artillery.
Airey Neave was started on March 4, 1974 and was involved in the Battle of France.
Airey Neave battles in Battle of France, which was commanded by Hugo Sperrle.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge and was involved in the World War II battle.
Airey Neave was a battle in World War II, where Franklin D Roosevelt was the commander.
Airey Neave was a battle in World War II, where Joseph Stalin was the commander.
Albert B White was born on 1856-09-22 and died in 1941.
Albert B White was born on the 22nd of September 1856 and is a Politician.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City, New Mexico and died in Dona Ana County, New Mexico.
Albert Jennings Fountain, who was vice president Edmund J Davis, died in the New Mexico Territory.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City and is part of the Republican Party of the United States.
Alberto Teisaire, who was appointed as the Provisoire President of the Argentine Senate, was appointed as the successor of Isaac Rojas.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria and Hungary.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria and is in the Tyrol state.
Alfred Moore Scales, who was appointed Governor of North Carolina, was a successor to James W Reid.
Alfred Moore Scales was the successor of Daniel Gould Fowle who graduated from Princeton University.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut and worked as a House of Representatives.
Alfred N Phillips served as a military officer in the United States Army, which was involved in the American Civil War.
Allan Shivers was a fighter in World War II, where Joseph Stalin was the commander.
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. He was a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 Port Arthur.
Allan Shivers, who was appointed as a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 Port Arthur, was appointed by Ben Ramsey.
Alvah Sabin was born on October 23rd, 1793 and worked as Secretary of State of Vermont.
Agnes Kant is from the Netherlands where the currency is the euro.
Agnes Kant is from the Netherlands where Mark Rutte is a leader.
Albert B White died in Parkersburg West Virginia, United States.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Saskatchewan and plays for Wichita Thunder.
Jorge Orosman da Silva is the manager of Penarol where Abel Hernandez plays for the club.
Abel Hernandez plays for U.S Citta di Palermo and Penarol.
Adam Maher is a member of the Netherlands national under-17 football team and plays for AZ Alkmaar.
Adam Maher played for PSV Eindhoven and the Netherlands national under-17 football team.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad is in the Al Shorta SC club and plays for Steel Azin F.C.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvarosi TC and is managed by Thomas Doll.
Akeem Adams plays for the Trinidad and Tobago national football team and is affiliated with the T&TEC Sports Club.
Akeem Ayers, who was a member of the New England Patriots, was picked for draft pick 39.
Akeem Ayers, who was a member of the Tennessee Titans, was picked for draft pick 39.
Akeem Dent was born on September 27th 1987.
Akeem Priestley plays for Connecticut Huskies and Sheikh Russel KC.
Akeem Priestley plays for RoPS and Sheikh Russel KC.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra is a club in Al Khor Sports Club and has its ground in Al Khor.
Al Kharaitiyat SC, managed by Amar Osim, play in the Al Kharaitiyat SC club.
Alan Martin is a footballer who plays for Hamilton Academical F.C. and Leeds United F.C.
Alan Martin is a footballer at New Douglas Park and is affiliated with the Hamilton Academical F.C.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born on September 2nd, 1995 and plays for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland and plays for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow, whose manager is Valery Petrakov.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow and FC Kuban Krasnodar.
Aleksandr Prudnikov is in the Russian Football National League and plays for FC Tomsk.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv and FC Dinamo Batumi.
Alex Plante was born in 1989 in Manitoba.
Alex Tyus was born on August 8, 1988 in Pallacanestro Cantu.
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Tel Aviv B.C. and is in the Turkish Basketball Super League.
Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba, where the Conservative Party of Canada is the leader.
Adam McQuaid was born in Canada where the anthem is O.
Adam McQuaid was born in Canada where the English language is spoken.
Aleksandre Guruli is the manager of FC Dinamo Batumi, he plays for Levan Khomeriki.
Aleksandr Prudnikov is a player in FC Spartak Moscow, which has the ground of Otkrytiye Arena.
Akeem Priestley is in the Veikkausliiga league and plays for RoPS.
Akeem Adams is a member of the United Petrotrin F.C. club which has Palo Seco Velodrome.
Aaron Deer, who plays guitar, is from the genre Psychedelia.
Aaron Deer is from the United States and is from Indiana.
Aaron Turner is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist and is a member of the Twilight band. He is a genre of electroacoustic music.
Aaron Turner, who plays in the Avantgarde Metal genre, is a member of the Singing team.
Abradab is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist, Kaliber 44 and Magik rapper.
Abradab was born on November 12, 1978 in Katowice.
Abradab was born in Katowice, Poland.
Ace Wilder is a genre of Hip Hop music which has the stylistic origin of Disco.
The American singer Ace Wilder, who is a member of the Warner Music Group, is a solo singer.
Agustin Barboza was born in Paraguay and has a record label called Philips Records.
Alan Frew is a rock musician who plays the Fusion Genre and is also known as Bhangra.
Alan Frew is a rock musician who is influenced by Country music.
Albennie Jones is a jazz fan and has the stylistic origin of Blues.
Aleksandra Kovac is a solo singer and he is a fan of Pop.
Aleksandra Kovac is the creator of Rhythm and Blues, which is the stylistic origin of Blues.
Aleksandra Kovac, who was born in 1990, is a genre of Soul music.
Alex Day is a genre of Synthpop, which is a new wave music.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England in 1872.
Alfredo Zitarrosa, who is a solo singer, is from the Milonga music genre.
Alfredo Zitarrosa, who is a solo singer, is from the genre Taquirari.
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay and died in Montevideo.
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Montevideo and died in Uruguay.
Alfredo Zitarrosa, who is a solo singer, is a genre of Zamba artform.
Alison O'Donnell is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist, Bajik and Plastik Mak.
Alison O'Donnell is a folk rocker who was on the label Floating World Records.
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who plays voice bodhran percussion autoharp.
Allen Forrest is a hip hop musician who is a solo singer.
Andrew White is a musician who plays alternative rock, a music subgenre of Christian alternative rock.
Anders Osborne is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Phil Lesh and Friends and Band/associated Musical Artist Tab Benoit.
Anders Osborne is a member of the Rabadash Records label and is in the genre of Rhythm and Blues.
Anders Osborne is a member of Shanachie Records and is in the genre of Rhythm and Blues.
The Pop music genre is the genre of Andra singer who started in 2000.
Andra singer is the creator of Rhythm and Blues, which is the stylistic origin of Blues.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the band Christian Burns and the band Jonathan Mendelsohn.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the band of music and the associated musical artist, Jonathan Mendelsohn, and Mark Sixma.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Armin van Buuren and Jwaydan Moyine.
Andrew White is a musician who plays alternative rock and is influenced by the new wave music.
The band Al Anderson, NRBQ, is a genre of Country music which is played by Banjo.
Andrew White is a musician who is based in London and has a record label called Polydor Records.
19255 1994 VK8 has a apoapsis of 6603633000.0 km and a 0.0925 km per second.
410777 2009 FD has apoapsis 259776702.47055 km and a minimum temperature of 211.0 kelvins.
410777 2009 FD, which is a spacewatch, has a periapsis of 88234300000.0 and is a periapsis of 88234300000.0.
66063 1998 RO1 is 0.0999 km per second and was epoch on 11/04/1999.
66391 1999 KW4 was created in the epoch of 2004-07-14 and has a orbital period of 16244700.0.
66391 1999 KW4 was epoch of 2004-07-14 and has a rotation period of 9953.28.
James Craig Watson, who was a person who was found in 101 Helena, died in Peritonitis.
1036 Ganymed has a speed of 16.86 km per second and apoapsis of 611961000.0 km.
Walter Baade, who was born in the German Empire, is the discoverer of 1036 Ganymed.
Walter Baade is a German national who is the discoverer of 1036 Ganymed.
James Craig Watson, who was a person who was found in 103 Hera, died in Peritonitis.
103 Hera was found by James Craig Watson, a Canadian national.
N.R. Pogson, who was born in Nottingham, is the discoverer of 107 Camilla.
1089 Tama, formerly known as A919 HA, 1927 WB, was born on the 26th of November 2005.
1089 Tama has a temperature of 179.0 kelvins and a apoapsis of 373513000.0 km.
1097 Vicia, periapsis 279142000000.0, was published in the epoch on 31/12/1906 and was published in 2006.
109 Felicitas has a apoapsis of 523329000.0 kilometres and a temperature of 170.0 kelvins.
109 Felicitas, whose periapsis is 283326000000.0, was published in the epoch on 31/12/1906.
109 Felicitas was born on the 31st of November 2006 and has a rotation period of 47487.6.
10 Hygiea has a apoapsis of 523951582.33968 kilometres and a temperature of 164.0 kelvins.
10 Hygiea, formerly known as A900 GA, was published on the 27th of February 2015 and was a part of the epoch of 2015.
110 Lydia, which was born on the 31st of November 2006, has a mass of 6.7 kilograms.
110 Lydia, orbital period 142603000.0, was born on the 31st of November 2006 and was a member of the epoch.
A-Rosa Luna has a length of 125800.0 millimetres and is a cruise ship class.
A-Rosa Luna, which has a length of 125800.0 millimetres, was ordered on 22nd January 2004.
AIDAstella is operated by AIDA Cruises which is located in Germany.
AIDAluna is operated by AIDA Cruises which is located in Rostock.
AIDAluna has a length of 252000.0 millimetres and a top speed of 40.744.
AIDAstella has a length of 253260.0 millimetres and was christened on the 16th of March 2013 and was christened on the 16th of March 2013.
The builder of the ALCO RS-3 is Montreal Locomotive Works and it has a diesel-electric transmission.
ALV X-1 has a diameter of 1.524 metres and 2 rocket stages.
AMC Matador was built in Kenosha, Wisconsin in 1974 and was designed in the same year.
Richard A. Teague, who was a designer of AMC Matador, was a member of the Chrysler Group.
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo V-2 is in Argentina and has a length of 192000.0 millimetres.
The Saab 9000 is a related transport vehicle to the Alfa Romeo 164 which is a member of Milan and is attached to the assembly of the Italian company.
Alfa Romeo 164 is a similar transport type to Fiat Croma and is assembled in Italy.
The Italian assembly of the Alfa Romeo 164, which has the same transport as Lancia, is the same.
Alvis Speed 25 is a company that is based in Coventry.
Alvis Speed 25 is a transmission with a single plate clutch, a 4-speed gearbox, all-silent and all-syncromesh centre change lever, open tubular propeller shaft with metal joints, spiral bevel, fully floating back axle. The engine has 4387.0 cubicCentimetres.
Alvis Speed 25 is a transmission with a single plate clutch, a 4-speed gearbox, all-silent and all-syncromesh centre change lever, open tubular propeller shaft with metal joints spiral bevel, fully floating back axle.
AMC Matador is produced by American Motors, the successor of which is Eagle.
The first flight of the Antares rocket was on the 09th of January 2014 and it is located at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport.
ARA Veinticinco de Mayo V-2 is located in Argentina, where Gabriela Michetti is the leader.
Ariane 5 was designed by Airbus Defence and Space and was launched on the site ELA-3.
Ariane 5 is a product of Airbus Defence and Space which is owned by Airbus Group.
Aston Martin V8 is a similar transport system to Aston Martin RHAM/1 and is found in the United Kingdom.
Aston Martin V8 is a successor to Aston Martin Virage and is made by Aston Martin.
Aston Martin V8 is a related transport medium and is successor to Aston Martin Virage. Aston Martin DBS is also a transport medium.
Aston Martin V8 is the successor of Aston Martin Virage, which is a manufacturer of Aston Martin Virage.
Atlas II, which has a diameter of 3.04 m, was completed on the 16th of March 1998.
The launch site of Atlas II, designed by Lockheed Martin, is Cape Canaveral Air Force Station.
Audi A1 is a product of Audi e-tron and is part of the division of Audi.
Audi A1 is a product of Audi, a subsidiary of Ducati.
Audi A1 is a product of Audi, a subsidiary of Quattro GmbH.
Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person at AIDAluna which has the power type of Caterpillar Inc.
The Vandenberg Air Force Base is the launch site of the Antares rocket.
Aleksey Chirikov icebreaker is a construction company in Finland, where Juha Sipila is the leader.
General Dynamics Electric Boat is the parent company of General Dynamics, and the American submarine NR-1 is built.
Rolls-Royce Holdings own the MTU Friedrichshafen, which has the power type of A-Rosa Luna.
Aston Martin V8 is a member of the United Kingdom, where Elizabeth II is the leader.
The Purple Heart award for the American, Aaron S Daggett, was born in Maine and fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg.
Ab Klink was born in the Netherlands and graduated from the Erasmus University in Rotterdam. The Christian Democratic Appeal is the party.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub, who was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak, has Stephen Yong Kuet Tze as his deputy.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is a member of the Barisan Ra'ayat Jati Sarawak party. He is a resident of Sarawak and is a member of the residence of Barisan Ra'ayat Jati Sarawak.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State and graduated from the Technical Institute Kaduna. He was the Chief of the Defence Staff of Nigeria and worked at, and was appointed as Chief of the Defence Staff.
Olusegun Obasanjo is the successor of Abdulsalami Abubakar who is a member of the Nigerian Air Force. He is vice president of the Nigerian Air Force and is the Vice President of the country.
Olusegun Obasanjo is the successor of Abdulsalami Abubakar who is in the military branch of the Nigerian Army and is Vice President Atiku Abubakar.
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas, Galicia, Spain. He was a member of the Congress of Deputies and was a member of the office at the Congrès of Deputies.
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and is part of the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party.
Abner W Sibal was a member of the United States Army who was involved in World War II, where Joseph Stalin was a commander.
Abner W Sibal was born in Ridgewood Queens, was a member of the Connecticut Senate and was a member of the 26th District. He is a member of the Republican Party (United States).
Adam Holloway was a member of the Grenadier Guards, a member of the Graz War, and was a commander of the Graz War.
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham and attended Magdalene College Cambridge. He is a member of the Conservative Party (UK).
Adam Koc was born in Poland and was a leader in the Polish-Soviet War, which was commanded by Leon Trotsky.
Adam Koc was involved in the Polish-Soviet War which is part of the Russian Civil War. Leon Trotsky was the commander of the Polish-Soviet War.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece. He was Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman of Popular Orthodox Rally and was appointed as a Deputy Parliamentary Spokesman.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece and worked as a Minister for Health. He was also a minister for health.
Adonis Georgiadis is in office while Prime Minister Antonis Samaras is Prime Minister. The blue Adonis is a part of New Democracy, Greece.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands where Mark Rutte is a leader. He was a member of the House of Representatives and worked as a representative.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands where Mark Rutte is a leader. He is a member of the Socialist Party.
Agnes Kant was born in West Germany and graduated from Radboud University in Nijmegen. He was a member of the House of Representatives and worked at the office.
Airey Neave, which was fought in World War II, began on June 30th, 1953 and ended on July 30th, 1979.
Airey Neave, which was involved in World War II, began on March 4th, 1974 and ended on March 30th, 1979.
Albert B. White was born on 1856-09-22 and died on July 3rd, 1941.
Albert B White was born in Marietta, Ohio and was the wife of Agnes Ward White who was born in Ohio. William M. O. Dawson was the successor to Albert B. White.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group. He died in the United States.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City and died in New Mexico Territory.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York, Staten Island, United States. He died in the United States.
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires, whose governing body is the Buenos Aires City Legislature. Horacio Rodriguez Larreta is the leader of Buenos Aires.
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina and is a Rear Admiral. He was succeeded by Isaac Rojas.
Alfons Gorbach was born in the County of Tyrol in Austria. He died in Graz.
Albert E. Austin was the successor of Alfred N. Phillips who was born in Connecticut and was a member of the U.S. House of Representatives from the 4th district. He was also a member of the U.S. House of Representatives.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut and was appointed as a member of the U.S. House of Representatives from the 4th district. He was the successor of Albert E. Austin and served as a member of the U.S. House of Representatives.
Allan Shivers, who was born in the United States, was a member of the Texas State Senate and was a member of the District 4 Port Arthur. He was a member of the Democratic Party and was succeeded by Wilfred R. Cousins Jr.
Alvah Sabin, a resident of Burlington, Vermont, was a member of the state of Vermont, where the largest city is Burlington. It was completed on the 3rd of March, 1857.
Alvah Sabin was born on October 23rd, 1793 and is a member of the Whig Party (United States) led by Henry Clay.
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont and is a member of the Whig Party (United States) led by Daniel Webster.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in the United States and was commanded by Abraham Lincoln.
Alfred Moore Scales was a commander of the American Civil War, which was fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg which is part of the Military Conflict. Alfred Moore Scales was also a commander of the American Civil War.
Alfons Gorbach was born in the County of Tyrol and died in Austria. The leader of Austria is Doris Bures.
Alfons Gorbach was born in the state of Tyrol and died in Austria. The leader of Austria is Doris Bures.
Alfons Gorbach died in Styria, Austria. The leader of Austria is Doris Bures.
The Battle of Salem Church is part of the American Civil War and is commanded by Robert E Lee. Aaron S Daggett and Robert E Lee are both involved in battles at the Battle of Salem Church.
Ab Klink is a Dutch national who was born in Stellendam and has the currency of the euro.
The nationality of Adam Koc is Poland, where the language is Polish and the ethnic group is the Kashubians.
19255 1994 VK8 has a 5.6 kilogram mass and a apoapsis of 6603633000.0 km. It is 0.0925 km per second and has a 5.6 kilogram mass.
410777 2009 FD is a spacewatch discovery and has a periapsis of 88234300000.0. It has a period of 39447000.0 and a period of 88447000.0.
66063 1998 RO1 has a minimum temperature of -71.0 degreesCelsius and a maximum temperature of 500.0 kelvins. It has apoapsis of 254989570.60815 km.
66391 1999 KW4 has a density of 2.0 gramPerCubicCentimetres and a apoapsis of 162164091.8388 km. It has a average speed of 37.16 km.
1000 Piazzia, which was born on the 27th of June 2015, has a periapsis of 352497000000.0 and an orbital period of 488160.0.
1001 Gaussia, whose former name is 1923 OAA907 XC, has a periapsis of 419113394,55312 km and was born on the 27th of February 2015.
101 Helena, which has a apoapsis of 441092000.0 kilometres, has a total of 3.0 kilograms and a kilometre per mile. It is a escaping Velocity of 0.0348 kmPerSeconds.
Walter Baade is a German national who graduated from the University of Gottingen and is the discoverer of 1036 Ganymed.
103 Hera was found by James Craig Watson, who died in Madison, Wisconsin in the epoch of 2011-08-27.
James Craig Watson, who was found in Madison, Wisconsin, died in Peritonitis.
103 Hera, which has a apoapsis of 437170000.0 km, was born on the 27th of August 2011 and has a period of 1622.213 days.
103 Hera, which has a temperature of 170.0 kelvins, is apoapsis 437170000.0 km and is 0.0482 kmPerSeconds.
N. R. Pogson, who was born in Nottingham, England, is the author of 107 Camilla.
1089 Tama, known as A894 VA, A904 VD, was born on the 26th of November 2005 and has a period of 1202.846 days.
1089 Tama, a periapsis of 288749000000.0 and apoapsis of 373513000.0 km, was epoch of 2005-11-26.
1097 Vicia, whose former name is 1928 PC, was epoch 2006-12-31 and has a periapsis of 279142000000.0.
109 Felicitas, which has a mass of 7.5 kilograms, was born on the 31st of November 2006 and has an orbital period of 139705000.0.
109 Felicitas, apoapsis 523329000.0 km, was born on the 31st of November 2006 and has an orbital period of 139705000.0.
10 Hygiea is apoapsis 523951582.33968 km and has a average speed of 16.76 kmPerSeconds. It has a period of 5.57 days and an orbital period of 5.57 days.
10 Hygiea has a surface area of 837080.744 square kilometers, a surface area of 837080.744 square kilometers, and apoapsis 523951582.33968 km. Its average speed is 16.76 kmPerSeconds.
10 Hygiea has a surface area of 837080.744 square kilometers and a apoapsis of 523951582.33968 km. It has a temperature of 164.0 kelvins.
110 Lydia, a 6.7 kilograms mass, was born on the 31st of October, 2006 and has a periapsis of 377016000000.0.
110 Lydia, whose periapsis is 377016000000.0, whose apoapsis is 440756000.0, is from the epoch of 2006-12-31.
The associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Aaron Bertram, is the Kids Imagine Nation and is associated with the genre Pop music.
The Indie rocker, Aaron Deer, is from the United States and is from the United States.
The American, Aaron Deer, is from Indiana. He is also a character in Psychedelia.
The Black Metal character Aaron Turner is associated with the band Greymachine and the Twilight band.
Aaron Turner is associated with the genre Drone music and the Twilight band. He is also associated with the genre Drone music and the Greymachine band.
Aaron Turner is associated with the genre Ambient music and the Twilight band. He is also associated with the genre of music, Mamiffer and the Twilight band.
The Black metal is a genre of music, which is called Death Metal. The guitar is an instrument of Aaron Turner, who is also known as the Electric Guitar.
Black metal is a genre of music, which is called Death Metal. He is also known for playing Singing.
Abradab was born on November 12, 1978 and is associated with the Magik band and the associated Musical Artist, Kaliber 44.
Abradab is from Katowice and is associated with the Magik band and the associated Musical Artist, Kaliber 44.
Ace Wilder is a genre of Hip Hop music which is influenced by Funk and Disco.
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, where Juan Afara is the leader.
The associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Al Anderson, is associated with the band Singing and is a genre of rock music.
Alan Frew is a rock musician who is influenced by Country music and the Fusion Genre, Bhangra music.
Albennie Jones is a jazz fan, a genre that is influenced by Blues and the Fusion Genre of Afrobeat.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi and is a character in Rhythm and Blues which is a derivative of Disco.
Aleksandra Kovac is a member of the Band/associated Musical Artist Bebi Dol and is a member of the Band/associated Musical Artist K2 Kovac sisters duo. He is also known as a Pop music fan.
Aleksandra Kovac is associated with the genre Pop music and is a member of the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Bebi Dol. Kornelije Kovac is also a member of the associated Band/associated Musical Artist.
Aleksandra Kovac is a member of the K2 Kovac sisters duo and is a member of the Rhythm and Blues genre. The same band is associated with the musical artist Kristina Kovac and the K2 Kovac sisters duo.
Alex Day is a character in the genre of Pop music and is also a character in the genre of Synthpop.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England and died in Sidcup.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England and died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones was an American born in Manchester and died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, which is lead by the Labour Party (UK). He died in Sidcup.
Boris Johnson is the leader of London where Alfred Garth Jones died in Sidcup.
Alison O'Donnell is a member of the Flibbertigibbet and is a member of the Folk music of Ireland. He also plays with Mellow Candle and is associated with the Flibbertigibbet band.
Alison O'Donnell is a member of the Folk music genre and is associated with the musical genre Mellow Candle and Flibbertigibbet.
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who plays with the voice bodhran percussion autoharp and is also known as a member of the Funk genre.
Alison O'Donnell is a member of the Static Caravan Recordings genre and is a member of the genre of jazz. The genre is also known as Funk.
Allen Forrest, who was born in Dothan, Alabama, is a solo singer and is a genre of Pop music.
Allen Forrest, who was born in Dothan, Alabama, is a solo singer and is a genre of Rhythm and Blues.
Andrew White is a musician who is a fan of the genre of alternative rock, which is a form of Fusion Genre, Nu metal and has a stylistic origin of New wave music.
Anders Osborne is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist, Billy Iuso and Tab Benoit. He is also associated with Band/associated Musical Artist, Kirk Joseph.
Anders Osborne is a rock musician who is also known as Rabadash Records and is a member of the Fusion Genre of Bhangra music.
Andra singer is associated with the Dance Pop genre and Puya singer. The singer is also associated with the associated Band/associated Musical Artist and CRBL.
Andra singer is associated with the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Andreea Balan and Marius Moga. He is also known for Rhythm and blues.
Andra singer, who is a solo singer, is known for Rhythm and blues which is derivative of Disco.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the genre Trance and is a member of the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Christian Burns and Jonathan Mendelsohn.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the genre Trance music and Jonathan Mendelsohn. He is also associated with the genre Trance music and Bobina.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the genre House music and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Jwaydan Moyine.
Andrew White, who is associated with the band/associated Musical Artist, Marry Banilow and Kaiser Chiefs, is a member of the band and is a member of the band/associated Musical Artist. He is also a member of the band's record label Universal Records, which is now defunct.
The Ska punk is a style of origin of the Ska punk, he is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist and Suburban Legends.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi, United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
1955 Dodge, also known as Dodge Coronet, has a V8 engine and a transmission of 3speed automatic.
A-Rosa Luna, which has a length of 125800.0 millimetres, was ordered on the 22nd of January 2004 and is a class of cruise ships.
A-Rosa Luna has a length of 125800.0 millimetres and is 24 metres long. Its top speed is 1850.0 tonnes.
AIDA Cruises is operated by AIDAstella in Germany and is owned by Costa Crociere.
AIDAstella, which has a length of 253260.0 millimetres, was christened on the 16th of March, 2013 and was in service on the 17th of March, 2013.
The American Locomotive Company is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has a length of 17068.8 millimetres and a four-stroke engine.
The American Locomotive Company is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has a length of 17068.8 millimetres and a V12 engine.
The American Locomotive Company was founded in Schenectady, New York and has a length of 17068.8 millimetres.
ALV X-1 is from the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group and the people are known as Americans.
ALV X-1 is from the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and Native Americans are an ethnic group.
ALV X-1, which has a diameter of 1.524 metres, has 1 rocket stage and 1 total launch.
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe, which has a straight-four engine, was produced in 1958 and has a body style of coupe.
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe has a wheelbase of 2160.0 millimetres and a 1.55 length. It is a two door coupe.
Aleksey Chirikov icebreaker is 21.2 m thick and was built by the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard.
Alfa Romeo 164 is a similar transport system to Fiat Croma and is found in Italy, the capital of which is Rome.
The capital of Italy is Rome and the assembly of the Alfa Romeo 164 which has the same transport as Lancia.
The LANcia Thema is the related medium of transportation to Alfa Romeo 164, which is made of Fiat Croma and is made of Arese.
Alfa Romeo 164, which is a transportable medium, is saab 9000 and is a related medium to Fiat Croma and is assembled in Milan.
Alhambra, which has a length of 63800.0 millimetres, was launched on the 31st of July, 1855 and has a beam of 8.3 metres.
Alhambra, which is now Wrecked, was launched on the 31st of July 1855 and has a ship weigh of 8.3 metres.
Alvis Speed 25 is made from Petrol and was founded in Coventry.
AMC Matador is produced by American Motors, whose key person is Roy D Chapin Jr. and the fate of the Eagle automobile.
The Yuzhnoye Design Office manufactures the Antares rocket which is comparable to the Delta II which is from the United States.
The launch pad of the Antares rocket, which is made from the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport, is 0 metres long and is operated by the Yuzhnoye Design Office.
Arianespace is the manufacturer of Ariane 5 which is a launch site for the Guiana Space Centre.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine that is 5.3 litres long and is a related transport system. It is made from Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire, England, United Kingdom and is attached to the DBS.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine which is 5.3 litres in length and is a related transport vehicle to Aston Martin DBS. It is also a popular assembly in the UK.
Atlas II was launched by the Vandenberg Air Force Base at Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in the United States.
The leader of the United States is called the President and the origin of Atlas II. Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Atlas II was launched at the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in the United States and is located at Spaceport, Florida Launch Complex 36.
The Audi A1 is a 1.2 litre engine and is made from Hatchback. It is a prototype of the Audi Brussels assembly.
Audi A1 is a manufacturer of Audi, which has the related means of transportation of SEAT Ibiza and Volkswagen Polo.
AIDAluna is a power type company that was founded in California. It is located in Peoria, Illinois.
AIDAluna is owned by AIDA Cruises and has the power type of Caterpillar Inc.
AIDAstella is owned by Costa Crociere, which is located in Genoa. It is operated by AIDA Cruises.
The United States is the origin of the United States and the launch site of the Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex 2 is the same as the Antares rocket.
The launch site of Ariane 5 is ELA-3 which is located at the Guiana Space Centre in French Guiana.
The launch site of Ariane 5 is ELA-3 which is located in Kourou, French Guiana.
Neptun Werft is located in Rostock, Germany. He is the builder of A-Rosa Luna.
The American people are an ethnic group in the United States, where Atlas II is from. The country's origin is African American.
Aaron Hunt plays for VfL Wolfsburg and youth club Goslarer SC 08 and is part of SV Werder Bremen.
Aaron Hunt played for VfL Wolfsburg, SV Werder Bremen II and is managed by Dieter Hecking.
Abel Hernandez plays for the youth club Central Espanol and is attached to the U.S Citta di Palermo. He is also a member of the Hull City A.F.C. club.
Abel Hernandez plays for the youth club Central Espanol and the U.S Citta di Palermo. He also plays for Penarol.
Adam Maher was born in the Netherlands and plays for PSV Eindhoven and AZ Alkmaar.
Akeem Adams is a member of the W Connection F.C. club and plays for United Petrotrin F.C., which has Palo Seco as its ground.
Akeem Ayers, who was previously in the Los Angeles Rams, was in the Draft Round 2 and has 39 draft picks.
Akeem Ayers, who was previously in St Louis Rams, was in the Draft Round 2 and was picked 39 times.
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on September 27th 1987. He was the first player to be part of the Atlanta Falcons team.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra was born in Iraq and is part of the Shabab Al-Ordon Club. He is also part of the Iraq national under-20 football team.
Al Kharaitiyat SC, whose ground is in Al Khor, are the clubs of Al Kharaitiyat SC and Shabab Al-Ordon Club.
Alan Martin was born on 1st January 1989 and played for Hamilton Academical FC. He is also a member of the Clyde FC.
Alan Martin is a footballer who plays for Accrington Stanley FC and is attached to the club Motherwell FC. He is also a member of the Accrington Stanley FC which has its ground in Accrington.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born on September 2nd 1995 in Tampere, Finland. He played for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2nd 1995. He was the draft team of the Florida Panthers.
Aleksandr Chumakov was born in the Soviet Union and died in Russia where Vladimir Putin is the leader.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on February 24th, 1989 and plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar and FC Alania Vladikavkaz.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on February 24th, 1989 and plays for the Russia national football B team and FC Tom Tomsk.
Aleksandre Guruli is in the AZAL PFK club and plays for Olympique Lyonnais, the ground of which is Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Aleksandre Guruli is in the US Lesquin club and plays for Olympique Lyonnais. The ground of Olympique Lyonnais is the Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for Italy national under 16 football team and is managed by Sinisa Mihajlovic.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and is affiliated with A.C. Milan, where the manager is Sinisa Mihajlovic.
Alessio Romagnoli plays for the Italian under-16 football team and A.S. Roma. He is also part of the club where Daniele Zoratto is the coach.
Alessio Romagnoli was born in Italy and played for U.C. Sampdoria and the Italy national under-17 football team.
Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba and has a height of 1.9304. He plays for Anyang Halla.
Alex Plante was born in Canada and has a height of 1.9304. He plays for Anyang Halla and is in the club.
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Ashdod B.C. and is in the Euroleague. He is also a player in the club Maccabi Ashdod B.C. and has been coached by Zvi Sherf.
Alex Tyus is in the Turkish Basketball Super League and is a member of the Maccabi Ashdod B.C. and has been coached by Zvi Sherf.
Aleksandr Prudnikov is in the FC Spartak Moscow club and plays for FC Tom Tomsk. He is also attached to the ground of Otkrytiye Arena.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Anzhi Makhachkala and is a youth club at the Otkrytiye Arena.
Aleksandr Chumakov is in the FC Torpedo Moscow club, which has Valery Petrakov as the manager. The club played in the 2014-15 Russian Premier League season.
Abel Hernandez is a member of the Uruguay Olympic football team and plays for Hull City A.F.C. and Steve Bruce is the manager of the club.
Aleksandr Chumakov was born in Moscow and died in Russia. Sergey Sobyanin is the leader of Moscow.
Luis Miguel Ramis is the manager of Real Madrid Castilla, a Brazilian under-20 footballer.
Luis Miguel Ramis is the manager of Real Madrid Castilla and plays for C.D. FAS.
Alex Tyus was born in St Louis, Greater St Louis, where Francis G Slay is the leader.
The Tennessee Titans, who were previously in the New England Patriots team, were the first team to be played by Akeem Ayers.
Akeem Adams is a member of the Trinidad and Tobago national under-20 football team and plays for United Petrotrin F.C. who have their ground at Palo Seco.
Alexander Nouri is the manager of SV Werder Bremen II which is in the 3 Liga league. Aaron Hunt is in the SV Werder Bremen II club and plays for SV Werder Bremen II.
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol and is part of the youth club, Central Espanol. He is also a member of the Hull City A.F.C. club, and has been managed by Steve Bruce.
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol, Central Espanol and U.S Citta di Palermo. He is managed by Jorge Orosman da Silva.
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol youth club and manages U.S. Citta di Palermo. He plays for U.S. Citta di Palermo who play in Serie A.
Adam McQuaid was born in Prince Edward Island on October 12th, 1986 and has a weight of 94.8024 kilograms.
Adam McQuaid is a member of the Boston Bruins club, which is in Columbus, Ohio. He is the general manager of Boston Bruins, which is where Don Sweeney is.
Akeem Ayers was born on July 10th, 1989 and was part of the St Louis Rams team. He was also a member of the Tennessee Titans' debut team.
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on September 27th 1987. He was a member of the Houston Texans and was part of the Houston Texans team.
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on September 27th 1987. He was a member of the Atlanta Falcons and was previously a member of the Houston Texans.
Al Kharaitiyat SC, managed by Amar Osim, is in Al Khor and has the ground of Al Khor. Al Kharaitiyat SC is also in the Al Kharra'a SC club.
Al Kharaitiyat SC, whose ground is in Al Khor, are the home ground of Al Kharaitiyat SC. The Iraq national under-23 football team are the players in the club. The manager of Al Kharaitiyat SC is Amar Osim.
Al Kharaitiyat SC, whose ground is in Al Khor, is managed by Amar Osim. The club is also affiliated with Shabab Al-Ordon Club.
Alan Martin (born on 2001-01-01) is a member of the Hamilton Academical F.C. and is a member of the Crewe Alexandra F.C. and has a height of 185.42 centimetres.
Alan Martin (born on 2001-01-01) is a footballer who has a height of 185.42 centimetres and is attached to the Crewe Alexandra F.C. and is a member of the Scotland national under-21 football team.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on February 24th 1989 and plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar and FC Dynamo Moscow. He has a height of 185.0 centimetres.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on February 24th 1989 and is a player in FC Spartak Moscow. He has a height of 185.0 centimetres and is attached to the club FC Rubin Kazan.
Aleksandre Guruli was born in Batumi and is in the FC Karpaty Lviv club. He has a height of 178.0 centimetres and is attached to the club FC Zestafoni.
Alex Plante was born in Canada on 2009-05-09 and played for Anyang Halla.
Alex Plante was born in Canada in 1989 and has a height of 1.9304. He plays for Anyang Halla and is a member of the club.
The anthem of Canada is O, and Elizabeth II is the leader of the country. The language spoken in the country is Inuktitut and the country is the birthplace of Aaron Boogaard.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the country, where the Asian Canadians are an ethnic group and Aaron Boogaard was born. The anthem of the country is O, and the leader of the country is called Elizabeth II.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the country where the language spoken is Slavey. The country is the birthplace of Aaron Boogaard. The anthem of the country is O.
Aleksandr Prudnikov is attached to the club FC Kuban Krasnodar and is attached to the club FC Terek Grozny. He is also manager of FC Terek Grozny and plays for FC Terek Grozny.
Aleksandr Chumakov is the manager of FC Torpedo Moscow which is led by Valery Petrakov. The club played in the 2014-15 Russian Premier League in which FC Torpedo Moscow was coached by Aleksandr Tukmanov.
Houston Texans are located in Houston, Texas. They are the first team to be played by the Atlanta Falcons and the former team Akeem Dent.
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol, the Uruguayan Primera Division and is in the youth club, Hull City A.F.C., whose manager is Steve Bruce.
19255 1994 VK8 was epoch of 2006-12-31 and has an orbital period of 8788850000.0. It has a periapsis of 6155910000000.0 and an apoapsis of 6603633000.0 kilometres. It has an orbital period of 8788850000.0 and an orbital period of 8788850000.0.
66063 1998 RO1 is apoapsis 254989570.60815 kilometres and has an orbital period of 360.29 days. It was epoch of 2013-11-04 and has a 0999 km per second orbital period.
66063 1998 RO1 is apoapsis 254989570.60815 km and has a mean temperature of 265.0 kelvins. It was epoch of 2013-11-04 and has an orbital period of 360.29 days.
1000 Piazzia, which is a periapsis of 352497000000.0, was born on the 27th of February 2015 and has a periapsis of 352497000000.0. Its epoch is 2015-06-27 and its epoch is 488160.0. Its epoch is the epoch is 0.0252 kmPerSeconds.
Sergey Belyavsky was the discoverer of 1001 Gaussia which was dated on the 27th of June 2015 and has a periapsis of 419113394.55312 km. Its former name is 1923 OAA907 XC and it was erected on the 27th of February 2015.
Walter Baade was born in the German Empire and graduated from the University of Gottingen. He is a doctoral student at the University of Gottingen and is the discoveryer of 1036 Ganymed.
Walter Baade, who was born in Preussisch Oldendorf, graduated from the University of Gottingen and graduated with a doctoral student called Halton Arp, is the discoverer of 1036 Ganymed.
Walter Baade, who was a student at the University of Gottingen, died in West Germany. He graduated from the University of Gottingen and graduated with a doctoral student called Halton Arp.
James Craig Watson, who was a student at the University of Michigan, died in Madison, Wisconsin. He died in the city of Peritonitis.
103 Hera, apoapsis, 437170000.0 km, is found by James Craig Watson, a Canadian who died in Madison, Wisconsin.
James Craig Watson, a Canadian, was found in Madison, Wisconsin. He died in Peritonitis.
N. R. Pogson was born in Nottingham and died in Chennai. He has a periapsis of 479343000.0 kilometres.
N R Pogson was born in Nottingham and died in Chennai. He was the first person to discover 107 Camilla, which was discovered on the 1st of March 2001.
1089 Tama, known as A894 VA, A904 VD, was born on the 26th of November 2005 and has a periapsis of 288749000000.0. It has a period of 1202.846 days and a period of 288749000000.0.
1089 Tama, which is a kilometre long escape Velocity of 0.0068 kmPerSeconds, was epoch on the 26th of November 2005 and has an apoapsis of 373513000.0 km.
1097 Vicia, which has a total of 9.8 kilograms, was epoch of 2006-12-31 and has an apoapsis of 511592000.0 km. It was orbital period 135589000.0 and has an orbital period of 135589000.0.
109 Felicitas, whose periapsis is 283326000000.0, was born on the 31st of October, 2006 and has a velocity of 0.0473 km per second.
10 Hygiea, known as A900 GA, was born on the 27th of February 2015 and has a periapsis of 416136000000.0. It has a period of 5.57 days and a period of 5.57 days.
1101 Clematis was epoch of 2006-12-31 and has an orbital period of 183309000.0. It is apoapsis 520906000.0 and has a kilometre per second. It is 0.02 km per second.
1101 Clematis was a periapsis of 445895000000.0 and was dated on 31st of October 2006 and has the former name 1928 SJ.
1101 Clematis is a periapsis of 445895000000.0 and is found in the epoch of 2006-12-31. Its epoch is 183309000.0 and its escape velocity is 0.02 kmPerSeconds.
1955 Dodge, which has a wheelbase of 120.0 inches, is made with V8 engines and has a transmission of 3speed automatic.
DeSoto Custom, a 1955 Dodge, is a related vehicle to Chrysler Newport and is a successor to DeSoto Firedome.
AIDAstella is operated by AIDA Cruises which is located in Rostock and owned by Costa Crociere. Meyer Werft is the builder of the AIDAstella.
AIDAstella, which has a length of 253260.0 millimetres, is operated by AIDA Cruises and owned by Costa Crociere. The builder of the building is Meyer Werft.
The American Locomotive Company was the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which was built between May 1950 and August 1956. It has a V12 engine and a diesel-electric transmission.
The American Locomotive Company was the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has a length of 17068.8 millimetres and a V12 engine. It was built between May 1950 and August 1956.
The American Locomotive Company, founded in Schenectady, New York, is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has a length of 17068.8 millimetres.
The builder of the ALCO RS-3 is Montreal Locomotive Works. It was built in May 1950 - August 1956 and has a V12 engine. The engine type of the RS-3 is diesel-electric transmission.
The builder of the ALCO RS-3, which has 12 cylinders, was Montreal Locomotive Works and was built in May 1950 - August 1956. The engine is a four-stroke engine.
AMC Matador (also known as American Motors Matador) is made from a station wagon and is made from AMC V8 engine. It is also known as the AMC Matador which is made in Mexico City.
AMC Matador (alternatively known as VAM Classic) is a Midsize car that is made from AMC straight-6 engine and is made in Kenosha, Wisconsin.
Acura TLX is a Midsize car that is made from front-wheel drive and all-wheel drive. It is made from Honda K engine and is made in Marysville, Ohio.
The assembly of Acura TLX is Marysville Auto Plant. It has a V6 engine and is a luxury vehicle.
Aleksey Chirikov icebreaker is a 21.2 beam shipbreaker built by Arctech Helsinki Shipyard in Finland. The icebreaker is in service and is currently in service.
Aleksey Chirikov icebreaker is a builder of Helsinki, Finland. Juha Sipila is the leader of Finland.
Aleksey Chirikov icebreaker is 21.2 beam and is in service. It was built by the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard and is built in Helsinki.
Alfa Romeo 164, which is a straight-four engine, is made in Italy and is also available in the same way as the Lancia Thema. It is also used in the assembly of Italy and has Saab 9000 as its main transport vehicle.
Alfa Romeo 164 is a V6 engine and is made from Fiat Croma and is made in Italy. It is also a transportable medium called Saab 9000.
Alhambra, which is a ship that was launched on the 31st of July 1855, has a length of 63800.0 millimetres and is 8.3 metres long.
Alvis Car and Engineering Company, founded in Coventry, is the manufacturer of Alvis Speed 25 which has a Petrol engine and its successor is Rover Company.
Alvis Speed 25 is a straight-six engine engine manufactured by Alvis Car and Engineering Company which was founded in Coventry. The company's successor is Rover Company.
American Motors, whose successor is Eagle, is the manufacturer of AMC Matador. The company's key person is Roy D. Chapin Jr.
The American submarine NR-1, built by General Dynamics Electric Boat, is 3.8 m long and was launched on 25 January 1969. It has a top speed of 8.334.
The American submarine NR-1, which has a length of 45000.0 millimetres, was launched on 25 January 1969 and has a length of 8.334. It is 3.8 metres long and has a 3.8 m long ship.
The launch site of the Antares rocket is the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0 and it was designed by the Yuzhnoye Design Office. It was completed on October 28th, 2014 and was completed on April 21st, 2013-04-21.
The Yuzhnoye Design Office manufactures the Antares rocket which was launched on the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport (launch pad 0) on the 21st April 2013 and was completed on the 18th September 2013 with the final flight of 2013-09-18.
Aston Martin V8 is a popular assembly in the United Kingdom, the capital city of which is London. The successor of Aston Martin Virage is Aston Martin Virage, and the manufacturer is Aston Martin Virage.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine which is 5.3 litres in length and is a popular transport system in the UK. The Aston Martin V8 is also a transport system for Aston Martin DBS and Aston Martin RHAM/1.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine and is 5.3 litres in length. It is the successor to Aston Martin Virage which is made by Aston Martin DBS.
The launch site of Atlas II, which has a diameter of 3.04 m, is located at the Vandenberg Air Force Base and was completed on the 5th of October, 2002.
Audi A1 is a Supermini and has a front-engine front-wheel drive layout. It is 1.2 litres long and is made from 1.2 litres of engine. It is also in the class of Supermini and is assembled by Audi Brussels.
Audi A1 is a company that was founded by August Horch and is part of the division of Audi e-tron. The company is subsidiary of Ducati.
AIDAluna is owned by AIDA Cruises and is located in Illinois. Caterpillar Inc. is a power type company owned by AIDAluna.
AIDAstella is owned by Costa Crociere, which is located in Genoa. The builder of the building is Meyer Werft and the operator is AIDA Cruises.
The United States is the origin of the United States and the launch site of the Antares rocket, which is a similar type of rocket. The rocket is located at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport, which is the launch pad 0.
The Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex 2 is the launch site of the Vandenberg AFB Space Launch Complex. The Antares rocket is comparable to the United States.
The Sedan automobile is the body style of Alfa Romeo 164 which is a Sedan vehicle and is a part of Italy. The Carrolo 164 is also a transportable by Opel Vectra.
The Sedan automobile is the body style of Alfa Romeo 164 which is a Sedan vehicle and is also used in the assembly of Milan. Opel Vectra is the related means of transportation.
General Dynamics Electric Boat is a company owned by General Dynamics, which is 3.8 m long. The American submarine NR-1 is a builder of the American submarine, which is located in Groton, Connecticut.
The builder of A-Rosa Luna is Neptun Werft, who is located in Rostock, Germany. Stanislaw Tillich is the leader of Germany.
The capital of the United States is Washington D.C. and the language spoken is English. The country is the origin of Atlas II and African Americans are one of the ethnic groups.
The United States is the origin of the country Atlas II which is a traditional dish from the United States. The capital of the country is Washington DC and the ethnic group is African American.
Brian Robertson trombonist is the band member of the Suburban Legends, which is a genre of Ska punk. The associated Band/associated Musical Artist is called Kids Imagine Nation.
Aaron Deer is from Indianapolis, Indiana and is a solo singer. He is also from the genre Psychedelia.
Aaron Turner is associated with the Isis band and Sumac band and is a member of the Electroacoustic music genre. He is also associated with the band Singing.
Aaron Turner, who was born in 1995, is associated with the Twilight band and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Old Man Gloom.
The Black metal is a genre of music, which is known as the Death Metal. The guitar is an instrument of the same name, the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, the Sumac band.
Ace Wilder was born on July 23, 1982 in Stockholm. He was a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born on July 23, 1982 in Sweden. He was a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm in 1982 and performed as a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born in Sweden in 1982 and performed as a solo singer.
The United States is the origin of the American singer Ahmet Ertegun, who is a member of the Rhythm and Blues genre.
The African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where the genre of rock and roll is known as Ahmet Ertegun. The country is the origin of the country and the style of the rock and roll is blues.
Albennie Jones, who is a member of the Disco family, was born in 1950 and has a style of blues.
Albennie Jones was born in the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group and the blues are the origins of jazz.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972 and is a singer who is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in the Socialist Republic of Serbia in 1972 and is a solo singer. He is known for Rhythm and Blues.
Alex Day, who was born in 2006, is associated with the Chameleon Circuit band and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Charlie McDonnell. He also performed in the genre of Acoustic music.
Alex Day, who was born in 2006, is associated with the Chameleon Circuit band and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Charlie McDonnell. He is also associated with the band Electronic music.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England in 1872 and died in London.
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay. The people of Uruguay are called Uruguayans and the leader is Daniel Martinez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa, who was born in Uruguay, is a solo singer and has a record label called RCA Records.
Alison O'Donnell, who was born in 1963, is associated with the genre Folk music and Flibbertigibbet. He is also associated with the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Bajik and also associated with the associated Musical Artist Flibbertigibbet.
Alison O'Donnell, who was born in 1963, is associated with the genre Folk music and is associated with the same band as Mellow Candle. He is also associated with the genre Folk music and is a member of the Head South By Weaving.
The rapper Alison O'Donnell is a member of the Floating World Records label, which is located in London. He is also known for jazz.
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz fan and is a member of the Deram Records which is located in London. He also has Fruits de Mer Records as a record label.
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell in 1981 and is a solo singer. He is a genre of acoustic music.
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, KY in 1981 and is a solo singer. He was a member of the Hip Hop genre and is a member of the group.
Marry Banilow is the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Andrew White is a member of the alternative rock genre, which is the genre of nu metal.
Anders Osborne is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Billy Iuso and Band Benoit. He is also associated with Band/associated Musical Artist Galactic and also played in Rock music.
Anders Osborne is a record label for Shanachie Records and is located in Chicago. Alligator Records, which are genre Blues, are also from Chicago.
Andra singer, who was born in Romania, is a dance-pop singer. He is a solo singer and performs singing.
Andra singer is the creator of Rhythm and blues, which is a derivative of Funk and Disco.
Andrew Rayel, who was born in 2009, is associated with the genre Trance and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Christian Burns, Jonathan Mendelsohn.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Trance music, which is influenced by house music and is influenced by Jwaydan Moyine. He is also associated with Jwaydan Moyine and Christian Burns.
Andrew White, who was born in 2003, is associated with the musical artists Kaiser Chiefs and Marry Banilow. He is also associated with the musical artists, and is a genre of alternative rock.
Andrew White, who was born in 2003, is associated with the band Kaiser Chiefs and Marry Banilow. He is also associated with the band and the band's associated Musical Artist, and has been associated with the band's associated musical artist, Universal Records, which is now funct.
Agustin Barboza, who is a leader in Paraguay, is a member of Gran Asuncion. Juan Afara is the leader of Paraguay.
The Wildweeds is the genre of Country music, which is also known as Banjo. The band Al Anderson NRBQ is associated with the band The Wildweeds and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist.
Allen Forrest is a fan of Hip Hop, which is influenced by the genre Funk and drum and bass.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England and is a leader in Manchester which is part of Greater Manchester. The Labour Party is the leader of Manchester.
The post-metal genre is called "Post-Metal" and it includes cello. The associated Band/associated Musical Artist, House of Low Culture, and the associated Band/associated Musical Artist, Aaron Turner.
The Twilight band, Aaron Turner, is associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist and uses the electric guitar as an instrument. Black metal is a music Fusion Genre and the band is also associated with the band.
Albennie Jones was born in the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group. He is the origin of Rhythm and Blues and his style is blues.
The Purple Heart award is for the American Civil War veteran Aaron S. Daggett who was born in Maine and died in West Roxbury.
The Purple Heart award for the American, Aaron S. Daggett, was born in Maine and died in West Roxbury. He battled Battle of the Wilderness and won the Purple Heart award.
Ab Klink was born in the Netherlands and graduated from the Erasmus University in Rotterdam. The office of Ab Klink is the Ministry of Health Welfare and Sport, and the office is the Ministry of Health and Sport.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri Malaysia and is part of the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu. He is a resident of Kuching and is from the Asajaya region.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is a member of the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu. He is a resident of Sarawak and is part of the Asajaya region.
Adenan Satem was born in Japan and is the successor to Adenan Mahmud who was born in Sarawak. He is a member of the Barisan Ra'ayat Jati Sarawak party and he is the successor to Adenan Satem who was born in British Borneo.
Adenan Satem, born in Japan, was the successor to Adenan Mahmud who was born in Sarawak. He is parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu and is a member of the party. He is also a member of the party, Adenan Satem, who was born in the British Borneo.
Oladipo Diya is the predecessor of Mike Akhigbe who is a Vice President. He is also the successor of Atiku Abubakar who is in the military branch of the Nigerian Army.
Abdulsalami Abubakar is a member of the Nigerian Air Force and is a Vice President of the Nigerian Air Force. He was predecessor of Oladipo Diya and his successor was Al-Amin Daggash.
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain. He is in office, while Monarch Juan Carlos I of Spain is the predecessor of Francisco Franco and is also in office, while Prime Minister Felipe Gonzalez is the Prime Minister.
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain. He was a Minister of Transport and was a minister of transport. He is a member of the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party.
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in New Britain, Connecticut and is a US national. He is the wife of Casey Ribicoff and Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and graduated from Magdalene College, Cambridge. He was involved in the Gulf War and began his career on 2005-05-05.
The Polish-Soviet War was fought by Joseph Stalin and the nationality of Adam Koc.
Adam Koc died in New York City. He was a member of the Russian Civil War and was part of the Polish-Soviet War. He was a commander of the Polish-Soviet War and was part of the Military Conflict.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece. He was Vice-President of New Democracy and was appointed as Vice President. He was succeeded by Makis Voridis.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece. He was appointed as Minister of Economy and Tourism and is now affiliated with the Ministry of Economy and Tourism. He was succeeded by Makis Voridis.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece. He was appointed as a member of the Hellenic Parliament and was succeeded by Makis Voridis.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands where the leader is Emile Roemer. The country uses the Euro as currency and is led by the Socialist Party.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands. He is a member of the House of Representatives and is a member of the Socialist Party. He is also a member of the Netherlands leader, Mark Rutte.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands where Mark Rutte is the leader. Emile Roemer is a leader of the Socialist Party (Nord).
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands and is a member of the Socialist Party (Nord) which is lead by Emile Roemer. The country is the home of the Socialist Party (Nord) which is in red.
Airey Neave, born in Knightsbridge London, was involved in the Battle of France and was started on June 30th, 1953 and ended on July 30th, 1979.
Airey Neave, born in Knightsbridge London, was involved in the Battle of France and was started on March 4th, 1974 and ended on March 30th, 1979.
Airey Neave is a unit of Royal Artillery, a Garrison of Hohne, and battled in World War II where Chiang Kai-shek was the commander.
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland, Maryland and died in Parkersburg, West Virginia. He was the successor to William M. O. Dawson who was born in Bloomington, Maryland.
Albert B White was born in Cleveland and was succeeded by William M. O. Dawson. He was on the start date of 1901-03-04 and has since retired.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York, where the French language is spoken and the commander was Abraham Lincoln. The American Civil War was fought by Abraham Lincoln.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York City and died in Dona Ana County, New Mexico. He was involved in the American Civil War, which was commanded by Jefferson Davis.
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in New York and died in the United States. He was born in Staten Island.
Alberto Teisaire is a member of the Justicialist Party and is in office as President Juan Peron. He died in Buenos Aires where the leader is Horacio Rodriguez Larreta.
Alberto Teisaire, who was born in Mendoza, Argentina, was a Rear Admiral and served as the Provisal President of the Argentine Senate. He was a predecessor to Isaac Rojas.
Alfred Moore Scales was born in Reidsville, North Carolina. He was a Governor of North Carolina and he was appointed as Governor of North Carolina. He was a successor to Daniel Gould Fowle.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut and served as a member of the U.S. House of Representatives from the 4th district. He was a member of the US Army, which was involved in the battle of the Whiskey Rebellion.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut and served as a member of the U.S. House of Representatives from the 4th district. He was a member of the Democratic Party (United States) and was succeeded by Albert E. Austin.
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Darien, Connecticut. He was a member of the Democratic Party of the United States and worked as Mayor of Stamford, Connecticut. He was succeeded by Albert E. Austin.
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. He was a member of the Democratic Party (United States) and served as Governor of Texas. He was succeeded by Price Daniel.
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas. He was a member of the Democratic Party (United States) and was appointed as Governor of Texas. He was the successor of Wilfred R Cousins Jr.
Alvah Sabin is a state of Vermont, the largest city in Burlington, and is a state of Vermont. He is a Secretary of State of Vermont, who is the location of the office and the 3rd congressional district.
Alvah Sabin is from Burlington, Vermont, the largest city in the country. He is a member of the Whig Party, which is led by Daniel Webster.
The Purple Heart award for Aaron S. Daggett is Purple Heart. He was a commander in the American Civil War, which is a part of the Military Conflict.
The national Alberto Teisaire is from Argentina, where Spanish is spoken and the President is Juan Peron. He is a member of the Labour Party and is a member of the party.
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina. He is a member of the Labour Party, Argentinia and is now President. He was succeeded by Isaac Rojas.
Meyer Werft is the builder of AIDAstella which is owned by Costa Crociere, which is based in Germany. The company is operated by AIDA Cruises which is owned by the company, which is a subsidiary of the parent company, the Carnival Corporation & plc.
AIDAstella, which has a length of 253260.0 millimetres, is operated by AIDA Cruises and has a 32.2 speed of 38.892 and a builder of Meyer Werft.
The American Locomotive Company is the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has 12 cylinders and a length of 17068.8 millimetres. It was built in May 1950 - August 1956 and has a four-stroke engine.
The American Locomotive Company was the builder of the ALCO RS-3 which has a length of 17068.8 millimetres and a V12 engine. It was built between May 1950 and August 1956.
ALV X-1 is from the United States, where the capital is Washington DC and the Native Americans are an ethnic group. The US is the origin of the US, where the anthem is The Star-Spangled Banner.
AMC Matador (also known as American Motors Matador) is a Midsize car and is made from AMC V8 engine and is made from the AMC V8 engine. It is also known as the AMC V8 engine and is made from the Thames, New Zealand assembly.
Alhambra is owned by the P&O company which is located in London. The building is made of Humphrys Tennant and Dykes and the ship beam is 8.3 m. The builder of Alhambra is Samuda Brothers.
American Motors, whose successor is Eagle, is a subsidiary of Wheel Horse and its fate is Chrysler. Roy D. Chapin Jr. is a key person at American Motors.
The American submarine NR-1, which has a length of 45000.0 millimetres, is 3.8 metres long and has a top speed of 8.334. It was launched on the 25th of January 1969 and has a ship draft of 4.6 m.
The United States is the origin of the United States. The rocket is a similar launch site to Delta II, which is the location of the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport. The rocket is also a launch pad 0 and the associated Rocket, Minotaur IV.
The Antares rocket, which has a diameter of 3.9 metres, was designed by the Yuzhnoye Design Office and was launched at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport (launch pad 0). It was completed on July 13th, 2014 and was completed on October 28th, 2014.
The Yuzhnoye Design Office is the manufacturer of the Antares rocket which was launched on the 28th of October 2014 and has a diameter of 3.9 metres. It was completed on the 18th of September 2013 and was launched on the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport.
Ariane 5 was designed by Airbus Defence and Space and was launched at the Guiana Space Centre in Guiana. Its first flight was 2009-12-18 and its first flight was 2005-08-11. It has a diameter of 5.4 metres.
Arianespace is located in Courcouronnes, France. The site of the Guiana Space Centre is located in French Guiana and it is operated by Arianespace. The launch site of Ariane 5 is ELA-3.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine and is a related transport vehicle. It is produced by Aston Martin DBS and is successor to Aston Martin Vantage. The V8 is 5.3 litres long and is made from Newport Pagnell.
Aston Martin V8 is a 5.3 litre engine and a 5.3 litre engine. It is a variant of the Aston Martin DBS and is a part of the Newport Pagnell assembly. It is also a variant of the Aston Martin V8 which has a coupe that is a coupe.
Aston Martin V8 is a similar transport type to Aston Martin DBS and is a successor to Aston Martin Virage, which is a popular product in the UK. The leader of the UK is Elizabeth II.
The Audi A1 is a Supermini and has a Hatchback body style. It is 1.2 litres long and is made from a front-engine front-wheel drive. It is also in the class Supermini and is made in Brussels, Belgium.
Audi A1 is a company that was founded by August Horch and is a subsidiary of Ducati. The company is also a member of the Audi e-tron division and Lamborghini.
AIDAluna, owned by AIDA Cruises, is located in Peoria, Illinois and is owned by AIDA Cruises. Caterpillar Inc. has a power type of Caterpillar Inc.
Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person at AIDA Cruises which is located in Rostock, United States. The company owns AIDAluna which has the power type of Caterpillar Inc.
Douglas R. Oberhelman is the key person at the company AIDAluna which is owned by AIDA Cruises and is located in Peoria, Illinois.
Meyer Werft is the builder of AIDAstella which is owned by Costa Crociere in Genoa. The company is the parent company of AIDA Cruises and the company is operated by AIDA Cruises.
Juha Sipila is the leader of Finland where the Sami languages are spoken. The country is the location of the icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov which was built by Arctech Helsinki Shipyard.
Neptun Werft is a building company in Rostock, Germany. The capital of Germany is Berlin and the leader is Joachim Gauck. The building is located in Rostock.
The building of A-Rosa Luna is located in Rostock, Germany. The capital of Germany is Berlin and the leader is Andreas Vosskuhle.
The Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the capital city is Washington DC and English is the language. The country is the origin of the book Atlas II.
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol, U.S. Citta di Palermo and is in the Uruguayan Segunda Division. He is also in the youth club of Penarol, where Jorge Orosman da Silva is the manager.
Aleksandr Chumakov, who played for the Soviet Union national football team, died in Russia. He is also a member of the FC Torpedo Moscow club and is managed by Valery Petrakov. The leader of the country is Valentina Matviyenko.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv, Olympique Lyonnais, Olympique Lyonnais, who have their ground at the Parc Olympique Lyonnais. Their chairman is Jean-Michel Aulas and their club is managed by Oleh Luzhny.
Alessio Romagnoli is in the U.C. Sampdoria club and plays for A.C. Milan, who have been manager of AC Milan, who play in Serie A.
Alessio Romagnoli is a member of the U.C. Sampdoria club and currently plays for A.C. Milan. The club's chairman is Silvio Berlusconi and the club is managed by Sinisa Mihajlovic.
Abel Hernandez plays for the Uruguay national football team and is a youth club at U.S. Citta di Palermo. He is also in the Uruguayan Segunda Division and is managed by Giuseppe Iachini.
The manager of FC Spartak, which is located at the Otkrytiye Arena, is Gadzhi Gadzhi Gadzhiyev. The club is owned by Aleksandr Prudnikov who played for FC Spartak, Moscow and is attached to the club FC Amkar Perm. The club's ground is the Otkrytiye Arena.
The ground of FC Terek Grozny is located in Grozny, the club is FC Spartak Moscow and the manager is Rashid Rakhimov. The club is owned by Aleksandr Prudnikov who played for FC Spartak Moscow and is also affiliated with FC Terek Grozny.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow and is attached to the club FC Terek Grozny. He is also manager of FC Terek Grozny and plays for FC Dynamo Moscow.
Aleksandr Chumakov was born in the Soviet Union and is now in the Soviet Union. He is also part of the Soviet Union national football team and is now manager of FC Torpedo Moscow. He played in the 2014-15 Russian Premier League in which Valery Petrakov is the manager.
The manager of Ferencvarosi TC is Thomas Doll and they have their ground at Palo Seco. The chairman of the club is Gabor Kubatov. Akeem Adams is a member of the Ferencvarosi TC and is affiliated with United Petrotrin F.C.
The manager of Ferencvarosi TC is Thomas Doll and they have their ground at Palo Seco Velodrome. The chairman of the club is Gabor Kubatov. Akeem Adams is a member of the Ferencvarosi TC and is affiliated with United Petrotrin F.C.
19255 1994 VK8 was epoch of 2006-12-31 and has a periapsis of 8788850000.0 and a periapsis of 661590000.0. It has a mass of 5.6 kilograms and a 6603633000.0 kilometres. It has an orbital period of 8788850000.0 and an apoapsis of 8703633000.0.
James Craig Watson, a Canadian, was found in 101 Helena, Wisconsin on August 15th, 1868. He graduated from the University of Michigan and died in Madison, Wisconsin.
James Craig Watson, who was born in Wisconsin, was a student at the University of Michigan. He was a descendant of the US and died in Madison, Wisconsin.
Walter Baade was born in the German Empire and died in Gottingen. He graduated from the University of Gottingen and graduated with a doctoral student, Allan Sandage.
Walter Baade was born in the German Empire and graduated from the University of Gottingen. He is the doctoral student of Halton Arp and is the doctoral student of allan Sandage.
Walter Baade is a German national who was born in the German Empire. He graduated from the University of Gottingen and is a doctoral student at Allan Sandage.
103 Hera was discovered on the 7th of September 1868 in Madison, Wisconsin. He was a Canadian and his alma mater was the University of Michigan. He died in Madison, Wisconsin.
103 Hera, a periapsis of 371240000.0 km, was found by James Craig Watson, who was a Canadian and died in Madison, Wisconsin. He graduated from the University of Michigan.
107 Camilla, whose periapsis is 479343000.0 kilometres, is a 107 Camilla, which was found by B Zellner, and whose epoch was 2006-12-31. It has a periapsis of 479343000.0 kilometres and a apoapsis of 560937000.0 kilometres.
107 Camilla, whose periapsis is 479343000.0 kilometres, is a 107 Camilla, which was found by C Woods, and whose epoch was 2006-12-31. It has a total orbital period of 2368.05 days and a total of 560937000.0 kilometres.
107 Camilla, whose periapsis is 479343000.0 km, is a 560937000.0 km long apoapsis and is found by F. Vilas. It was epoch of 2368.05 days and has an orbital period of 2368.05 days.
N R Pogson, an England national, was born in Nottingham and died in Chennai.
1089 Tama, known as A919 HA, 1927 WB, was born on the 26th of November 2005 and has a 0.0068 km per second. It has a apoapsis of 373513000.0 km and a period of 1202.846 days.
1101 Clematis, which is 5.7 kilograms in length, was epoch of 2006-12-31 and has an apoapsis of 520906000.0 km. It is a 5.7 kilogram long kilometre long apoapsis.
11264 Claudiomaccone, which has a temperature of 173.0 kelvins, was epoch on the 26th of November 2005 and has a periapsis of 296521000.0 km and a apoapsis of 296521000.0 km. It has an orbital period of 1513.722 days.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri Malaysia on the 21st of July 1936. He was part of the Parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu and is a resident of Kuching.
Adenan Satem was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and graduated from the University of Adelaide. He is the successor of Adenan Satem who is parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu. He is also a member of the party, which is parti Pesaka Bumiputera Bersatu. He is also a member of the party, Demak Jaya Jalan Bako Kuching Sarawak.
Oladipo Diya is the predecessor of Mike Akhigbe who served in the Nigerian Navy. He was the Vice President of the Nigerian Navy and was appointed by Atiku Abubakar. He was also the Vice President of the Navy. He was also the predecessor of Mike Akhigbe who was in the office of President.
Olusegun Obasanjo is the successor of Abdulsalami Abubakar who was in the military branch of the Nigerian Army. He was previously the predecessor of Oladipo Diya and is now Vice President Mike Akhigbe. He was also a member of the Army and is now in office.
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and died in the United States. He was a US national who was a Governor and was a member of the Democratic Party.
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and died in New York City. He was a United States national and served as Secretary of Health Education and Welfare.
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and died in New York. He is a US national who is a Native American. He is the wife of Casey Ribicoff.
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and graduated from Magdalene College Cambridge. He was a member of the Parliament for Gravesham and worked for the Grenadier Guards. He was a member of the military branch of Grenadier Guards and began working for the Militaria for Gravesham on 2005-05-05.
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham, Kent, England. He graduated from Magdalene College Cambridge and is a member of the Conservative Party (UK). He was part of the military branch of Grenadier Guards and began his career on the 5th of July 2005.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece. It was succeeded by Makis Voridis and is in office by Prime Minister Antonis Samaras and Prime Minister Konstantinos Mitsotakis.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands. He is a member of the House of Representatives and is a member of the Socialist Party (Nord) where Mark Rutte is the leader.
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands. He is a member of the House of Representatives in the Netherlands where Mark Rutte and Khadija Arib are leaders. He is also a resident of Doesburg.
The Socialist Party ( Netherlands) is led by Mark Rutte and Emile Roemer. Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands. He lives in Doesburg.
Albert B. White was born on July 22, 1856 in Parkersburg, West Virginia. He died on July 3, 1941 in 1941.
Albert B. White was born in Bloomington, Maryland and died in Parkersburg, West Virginia. He was the wife of Agnes Ward White.
Albert B White was born in Cleveland and was a governor of West Virginia. He was a member of the office of Albert B White, who was a wife of Agnes Ward White. He was a governor of West Virginia and was a member of the office of William M. O. Dawson. He was a member of the office and was a member of the 1905-03-04 team.
Albert B. White was born in Cleveland and was a candidate for the Republican Party of the United States. He was the first to start on the 3rd of March, 1901 and was the successor of William M. O. Dawson.
Alberto Teisaire was a member of the Labour Party, Argentina and was the President. He was also the wife of Eva Peron who was the President of Buenos Aires, where Horacio Rodriguez Larreta is the leader. He died in Buenos Aires.
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on October 20th, 1891. He was appointed as the Provisal President of the Argentine Senate and was appointed as the Rear Admiral. He was succeeded by Isaac Rojas.
Alfons Gorbach was born in the state of Tyrol in Austria. He was a member of the Austrian Peoples Party and died in Styria.
Alfons Gorbach was born in the state of Tyrol and died in Styria. He was a member of the Austrian Peoples Party and was part of the Imst party.
Alvah Sabin, who died in Sycamore, Illinois, is in the state of Vermont, where Burlington is the largest city and the 3rd congressional district is the district. He was a member of the state's legislature and was active on the 3rd of March 1857.
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, in the state of Vermont. He was the first to die in Sycamore, Illinois. The state's largest city is Burlington and the third congressional district is the district.
Jefferson Davis is the commander of the American Civil War, which is a battle at Battle of Gettysburg, which is part of the Military Conflict. Alfred Moore Scales is from the United States, where Native Americans are an ethnic group.
Jefferson Davis is the commander of the American Civil War, which was fought in the US, where Native Americans are an ethnic group. Alfred Moore Scales was a member of the US, and was a part of the Military Conflict.
Juan Peron is a national of Argentina and is a member of the Labour Party. He is the President of Argentina and his wife is Eva Peron. The Spanish language is spoken in the country.
Brian Robertson trombonist is the band member of the Suburban Legends, which is a genre of Ska punk, and is associated with the Kids Imagine Nation. The genre is also known as the Ska punk, which is a stylistic origin of Punk rock.
The American, Aaron Deer, who is a solo singer, is a member of the Band and Associated Musical Artist Wee Giant.
The Black Metal artist, Aaron Turner, is from the United States and is associated with the same band as the Black Metal artist, Old Man Gloom. He began working in 1995 and is a member of the Lotus Eaters band.
Aaron Turner, who was born in Massachusetts, is associated with the Twilight band and the Sludge Metal band Lotus Eaters. He began working in 1995.
Abradab was born in Katowice, Poland on November 12, 1978. He was associated with the Band/associated Musical Artist, Magik, and Kaliber 44.
Ace Wilder was born on July 23, 1982 in Sweden. He performed as a solo singer and was a member of the Singing Team.
Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm on July 23rd 1982 and performed as a solo singer.
Ace Wilder is a genre of Hip Hop music which is influenced by the genre Gangsta and Funk. The music is also influenced by drum and bass and is also influenced by Disco.
The genre of Hip Hop music is Funk and is a derivative of drum and bass. It was born in Sweden and it is also a part of the Disco genre.
The Wildweeds are the associated Band/associated Musical Artist of Al Anderson, NRBQ, who was born in Windsor, Connecticut and played in rock music. They were in the band which was started in 1966 and is associated with the band.
The band Al Anderson NRBQ is a rock genre and they are associated with the band and associated musical artist NRBQ. They play the Fusion Genre and Bhangra music and the guitar is an instrument of Al Anderson NRBQ. The band is also known for rock music which is stylistic origin.
Alan Frew was born in Coatbridge, Ontario and is a musician. He is a solo singer and originally from Newmarket, Ontario.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in the Socialist Republic of Serbia in 1972. He is a solo singer and a popular genre of Pop music is the Fusion Genre Disco.
Aleksandra Kovac, who is a solo singer, is a member of the Band/associated Musical Artist Kornelije Kovac. He was born in 1990 and is a fan of Rhythm and Blues.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in England in 1872 and died in London. He is a United Kingdom national who was born in Manchester.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester and died in Sidcup. London is lead by Boris Johnson and the European Parliament.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, where the leader is the European Parliament. He died in Sidcup and died in London.
Alison O'Donnell, who was born in 1963, is a member of the Floating World Records and is associated with the music genre of Ireland, Flibbertigibbet and Mellow Candle.
Alison O'Donnell is a member of the Stanyan Records, which is located in London. He is also known for jazz and is also known as the derivative of Funk.
Alison O'Donnell is a fan of jazz, a genre that is influenced by Funk and Afrobeat. He also plays the autoharp instrument and is the stylistic origin of folk music.
Alison O'Donnell is a musician who plays the voice bodhran percussion autoharp and is a fan of jazz, a genre that is influenced by Blues and is derivative of Funk. Afrobeat is the music Fusion Genre, and the genre is also influenced by the Blues.
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, Alabama in 1981. He is a solo singer and a genre of acoustic music.
Anders Osborne, who started in 1989, is associated with the genre Rock music and the voice of the Wetlands All-Stars. He is also associated with the genre rock music and the band Galactic.
Anders Osborne, who was born in 1989, is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist, Billy Iuso and Band Benoit. He also played Blues and was also associated with Band/associated Musical Artist, Tab Benoit.
Andra singer, who was born in Campia Turzii in 1986, is a dance-pop singer and a solo singer. He is a reality television judge and performs as a singer.
Andra singer, who was born in Romania in 1986, is a singer who plays in Rhythm and Blues. He is also a solo singer.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the Trance music genre, which is influenced by Pop and the music of Armin van Buuren. He is also associated with the genre of music such as the Beatles, Bobina Mark Sixma, Jonathan Mendelsohn, Christian Burns, Jwaydan Alexander Popov, Jano Alexandre Bergheau, Jonny Rose Sylvia Tosun Lira, Alexandra Badoi.
Andrew Rayel, born in Chisinau, Moldova, is associated with Trance music and Armin van Buuren. He was a member of the Band/associated Musical Artist, Christian Burns. He was involved in the band and began his career in 2009.
Andrew Rayel, who was born in Chisinau, Moldova, was part of the Trance music genre and started in 2009 as a member of the Jwaydan Moyine. He also played for Bobina and is also associated with the associated Band/associated Musical Artist.
Andrew Rayel is associated with the genre Trance and musical genre, including John Digweed and John Digweed. He also plays String instruments and also plays for the associated Band/associated Musical Artist Christian Burns.
Andrew White, who was born in 2003, is associated with Band/associated Musical Artist, Kaiser Chiefs, and Marry Banilow. He also has a record label called B-Unique Records and a record label called Polydor Records.
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell and is a fan of Hip Hop, which is influenced by Funk and drum and bass.
The genre of Hip Hop music is Disco and was born in 1981. The genre is also known as Funk and it is influenced by drum and bass.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, where the Labour Party is the leader. He died in Sidcup and died in London.
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion and died in Paraguay where the language is Spanish and the leader is Juan Afara. The Mestizo are an ethnic group in Paraguay.
Andrew White is a musician who is from London and is a member of the B-Unique Records record label. He is also a member of the Fusion Genre and is also a member of the alternative rock genre.
The album, "Alternative rock," was written by Andrew White who is from London and is also known as Universal Records. The album is also known as "Mussion Genre" and the latter is also known as "Universal Records".
The rock music genre of Al Anderson NRBQ is rock music, it's guitar is an instrument and it's stylistic origin is Blues. The band is also known for the Fusion Genre and Bhangra music.
Al Anderson, NRBQ band is a genre of rock music which is influenced by Blues and Banjo. The music is also influenced by the blues and the Fusion Genre.
The Black metal is a genre of music, which is known as Death and is a part of the Twilight band. The band is associated with the band Old Man Gloom and the band is associated with the band. The guitar player is Aaron Turner, who is also associated with the band.
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay. The leader of the country is Raul Fernando Sendic Rodriguez and the politician is Daniel Martinez. The language of Uruguay is Spanish.
